We’re seeking a VP, Digital Engineering, based in San Francisco, CA. In this role, you will drive product engineering for digital/commerce properties, inclusive of web, mobile, retail staging kiosk – powered by a sophisticated orchestration layer that integrates seamlessly to backend systems, as well as an ability to create open APIs for agnostic channel integration.
Sound interesting? Here are some specifics:
Own a three-year roadmap strategy of innovative, efficient technology solutions for digital front end.
Drive break through innovation to leap frog our money transfer products, while maintaining a delivery practice of operational sustaining simplicity.
Lead engineering integration with ground up solutions that drive competitive advantage.
Make solution decisions that help productize capability for any channel and GTM strategy.
Smartly chooses build v. buy.
Manage a team for analysis, design, programming, debugging, and modification of engineering systems and mobile apps.
Work with leaders across the globe and all functions within WU for roadmap development and delivery execution.
Act as a solution expert as needed to assist with new customer acquisition.
Explore and select new technologies that build the foundation for new product offerings and features.
What You Will Need To Succeed
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Sciences, Information Technology, Engineering
Deeply rooted understanding of many technologies that enable digital capabilities
Ability to influence with or without authority
Makes decisions, develops and implements solutions that have major touchpoints with the customer
Requires detailed functional knowledge, in-depth company knowledge and overall business knowledge.
Erroneous decisions will have a long-term effect on the company's success
Strategic Agility
Managing Vision & Purpose
Innovation Management
What Will Make You Stand Out
10-15+ years of experience in technology industry
Extensive experience in large scale consumer digital channel / eCommerce systems and managing large distributed teams across the globe composed of FTE and outsourced team functions
Multiple years building and leveraging cross-functional relationships requiring executive presence
Demonstrated accomplishment with driving digital/commerce transformation
Responsibilities/Duties

Strategy & Planning

Develop & establish the division’s technical vision and roadmap, accounting for risks & opportunities in partnership with the company’s Chief Enterprise Architect
Lead our resource allocation process to prioritize development initiatives in a way that transparently highlights trade-offs, enabling business goal achievement
Establish accountability & governance processes to direct & control development efforts to ensure that objectives are achieved, risks are managed appropriately & proactively, and the organization’s resources are used responsibly in particular to the area of software development
Identify technology trends and evolving user behavior that may support or impede our technological investments, and drive innovation that leverages key technology trends such as mobile, cloud, big data, responsive design, machine learning and modern APIs
Work in a consultative fashion with other relevant functional leaders, such as product management, sales, marketing, and batch delivery services as an advisor of technologies that may improve their efficiency and effectiveness
Support the company’s culture, mission and values by providing ‘leadership by example’ to functional heads
Conduct research and case studies on our competitors’ technologies and other relevant leading edge trends to make determinations on the probability of their usefulness in pursuit of our strategic goals
Ability to communicate the division’s technology strategy to company executives, external partners and customers.
Implementation & Deployment

Lead technical programs including software engineers, product managers and other engineering teams to get high-quality products and features through an agile, high velocity, fast-paced software project lifecycle, ensuring success metrics are informing future efforts, and quickly fine tuning the program as needed
Direct the execution of enterprise-wide information security plans to protect the confidentiality, integrity and availability of the division’s applications, data and servers
Promote and champion DevSecOps principles and practices and the productivity gains that result from continuous testing, integration and deployment.
Develop & train our staff in the exercise of a division-wide disaster recovery plan in collaboration with our EITS partners
Collaborate closely with Product Management and AgileWorks Lab to discover, develop and prioritize features with maximum business value
Establish a process to integrate Customer Service and Support through regular support resolution reviews of most prominent customer issues and improve application usability on an ongoing basis
Select & deploy performance profiling tools and procedures, including systems that monitor application performance and allow us to review any application failures in staging or production
Act as a good steward of the division’s human resources and ensure control of department budgets
Contribute to the broader leadership agenda on an ongoing basis and establish yourself as an accretive member of the division’s senior management team.
Desired Skills and Experience
Leadership Attributes

Proven track record of building strong teams, including prudent succession planning
Take responsibility for release schedules and milestones, keeping up a high velocity in a fast-paced environment
Lead several technical programs for the Google Cloud Business, setting priorities for products and engineering, leading cross-functional teams to take products to market, ensuring success metrics are informing future efforts, and quickly fine tuning the program as needed
Focus on consistently driving results by effectively managing capital budgets and headcount as governed by agreed-upon key performance indicators
Outstanding intellectual acumen with a natural willingness to engage in constructive & transparent discussions where the candidate is perceived as an articulate and accretive thought partner to the BU Leader and peers, and reflected by strong writing and presentation skills
Ability to inspire others by actively communicating and motivating all levels of staff with vision, clear execution priorities & support of BU direction
Strategic thinker who can understand competitive and technology context to drive positive current period results while investing for a better future
Education and Experience
MBA or equivalent experience in Computer Science and at least 15 years experience in the Information Technology field.
Minimum of 10 years management and strategic experience in this field preferred


This position provides long-term direction and oversight for the Company’s software and platform development lifecycles and activities, ensuring that releases are timely, complete, on budget and predictable. This includes overall responsibility for the identification, assessment, prioritization and planning activities for the implementation of software changes and initiatives that support strategic corporate objectives. This role interfaces with all aspects of the IT organization and is a highly visible role within the company.



REPORTING STRUCTURE & WORK SETTING

This position typically performs work at a field location and reports to the CIO. This position also works collaboratively with other peers in IT and with clients.



OTHER REPRESENTATIVE DUTIES

Manages five to six business lines supporting multiple systems and platforms, this entails multi-tasking different technologies that are geographically and technically dispersed.
Directs software development operations through the activities of other executives, and higher level managers. Ensures that technical projects remain on schedule and within budget and ensures that projects are completed according to corporate plan. This includes defining and meeting standards of quality assurance for new and ongoing deployments as well as defining and meeting standards for throughput and time-to-market in the software development lifecycle.
Formulates strong relationships and strategy with IT peers serving as a high level SME in software development. Communicates software release schedules across the organization and maintains open lines of communications to ensure that projects are completed in a timely and effective manner. Works with other departments to evaluate and develop the most effective software development services.
Identifies the business and IT needs of key projects, and ensures that software development professionals meet those needs.
Serves as a highly visible role with executives representing all software development activities that support the strategic objectives of the company. Ability to support the continuous growth of acquisitions and channel partnerships.
Relays aspects of the software development life cycle in a way that is understandable to senior leadership team, clients and customers.
Oversees the human resource planning, selection and allocation activities and authorizes the implementation of significant plans to support the software development department’s productivity and effectiveness. This includes responsibility for authorizing the implementation for personnel actions such as hiring, training, evaluating, rewarding, motivating and taking corrective action as necessary.
Maintains accountability for capital and other product development resources.
Handles and oversees administrative matters for the Software Development business unit. This including overseeing and directing the preparation of the organization’s budgets, instituting and directing operational planning and forecasting, identifying primary division goals and key measurements, and overseeing the development of internal controls for major programs. This position works closely with the Finance group to manage the team and operations within budget. Takes action to implement cost saving strategies where available.


SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITY

NOTE: WageWorks leadership will strive to uphold the mission, vision, and values of the organization. They will serve as role models for staff and act in a people-centered and results oriented manner with a focus on customer service.

This position entails formal direct managerial responsibility for a team of six to seven leadership direct reports that are technically and geographically distributed along with indirect leadership for an additional 100+ employees and contractors that roll-up through those direct reports.



QUALIFICATIONS

The knowledge, skill and ability to provide long-term direction and oversight for the Company’s multi-software and multi-platform development full life-cycles and activities as described as normally obtained through a minimum of 10 to 15 years of executive software development/consumer product delivery experience with at least 10 years’ experience directly managing, leading and growing a high functioning team. Prior experience with a software development company or technology and an emphasis on software delivery, roll out and implementation is required.



SPECIALIZED KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS & ABILITIES:

Multiple software development and technology environment experience; vendor management, desktop support, and QA is required.
Experience managing multiple technical departments with at least 50+ employees.
Dynamic and engaging leader with strong communication skills that has ability to bring new ideas and carry forward that vision.
Ability to manage multiple high level priorities
Global management preferred.
SAAS and Ecommerce experience preferred
Experience with web/internet facing clients
Comfortable with both software as a science and waterfall and agile methodology environments.
Possesses strong organizational and software development skills.
Familiar with project management life cycles.
A keen awareness of trends, general direction and the regulatory environment entailed in the HR services industry and the ability to consider those present and future relationships to the organization are critical.
A high level of conceptual, analytical, planning and organizational ability is required to analyze available information and establish the strategies and tactical plans to achieve them. Incumbent must be able to make high impact decisions even at times when insufficient information is available. Strong visionary and strategic skills and abilities are required.
Excellent organizational, leadership, communication, presentation and interpersonal skills are required to perform the functions as described. Incumbents must have the ability to navigate political arenas with ease as well as persuade, influence and sell change effectively while projecting a professional image. Strong client relations, customer service/customer delivery skills are essential.
Demonstrated ability to adapt to the changing demands of a growing business is a must.
Proficiency with business and communications software (preferably Word, Excel, PowerPoint, common Windows operating systems, and Outlook) is required. A strong, knowledge of SQL and Oracle experience is also required.


TRAVEL REQUIREMENTS & CONDITIONS

Moderate (25-50%) overnight travel and travel spanning 2 to 5 days to customer, client and company facilities.



EDUCATION

A broad knowledge of multi-product and platform IT skillset as normally obtained through completion of a Bachelor’s Degree in Business Administration, Marketing or Technology. An advanced degree or an MBA is preferred.



LOCATION

Irving, TX or Mequon, WI



Build Your Career at WageWorks!

Job description
company is seeking a highly energetic seasoned executive to lead and drive innovation in Software Defined Network (SDN) related technologies for delivering production Network Function Virtualization (NFV), for its newly created Solution Innovation Center. All service providers are focusing on lowering costs (Capex & Opex) and driving speed, agility, & innovation into their service offerings, they have embraced NFV (Network Function Virtualization) & SDN (Software Defined Networking) as the primary vehicle to accomplish these goals. company has been a leading supplier of solutions and services to the Telecom industry for over 40 years and is now expanding its portfolio & offerings into the virtualization space. These solutions are built around open NFV/SDN standards & integrated 3rd party partner components. As the industry transforms around the NFV/SDN paradigm, KGP has expanded its portfolio to include a range of services around virtualization integration, test & validation, solution life-cycle management, and other consulting services. As part of this expansion, company has recently launched a combined state-of-the-art Executive Briefing Center, R&D, & Lab facility at its 340K square foot logistics center in Irving, TX.

In this role, the candidate will be responsible for running and overseeing the operation of the Solution Innovation Center (SIC) and its business. Like the NFV concept itself, the SIC is a highly-leveraged model, building on the combined skills, unique knowledge and offerings of key partners to deliver well integrated, hardened and verified customer solutions.

Responsibilities:

Develop the overall technical strategy for the SIC along the lines of & consistent with the framework defined by the Cloud Division GM
Define & execute the associated partner & GTM strategy in cooperation with the VP of Business Development
Stay abreast of current and long-term partner developments and roadmap
Work with key partners to deliver hardened solutions that operators can deploy now, while working with key SDOs & ISGs to contribute to open best practices
Develop the SIC Offerings Roadmap across the services spectrum: Solution Life-cycle Management, other Consulting & Training services.
Engage key customers in strategic roadmap alignment
Operate within the approved annual operating budget
Hire & retain key R&D personnel required to grow the business
Provide technical leadership & mentorship and act as the last technical escalation point to resolve all SDN/NFV related architecture & engineering challenges.
Stay abreast on industry & technology trends. Contribute to standards bodies, technical conferences on the subject.
Evaluate technical aspects of competing products
Work closely with company’s other Business Units, acting as SME in Virtualization, Whitebox and other Cloud initiatives.

Qualifications:
The candidate we seek will be a strong technical leader and key member of the executive management team. He/she will have a strong track record of building and managing start-ups. The ideal candidate will be a senior engineering business leader within a company that either develops NFV/SDN products/components for the telco service provider network or is engaged in virtualization solution integration & testing services.

Additional key experiences and characteristics include:

10-15 years in IP networking, cloud virtualization and computing, network security, network operations, managed services delivery.
3 years in SDN/NFV field
Experience building teams form the ground up. The ability to spot, hire & retain high impact talent.
Experience managing in a highly-leveraged model with contribution coming from multiple partner vendor companies.
Proven experience delivering disruptive/highly innovative products or services to the marketplace.
Self-motivated with outstanding interpersonal skills with both internal and external teams and across companies.
Innovative, problem solver, passionate, and hands-on attitude.
Expert level knowledge of NFV & SDN concepts & standards
Experience in Communications Service Providers industry networks & services (wireline & wireless)
Core knowledge of design & integration patterns for network function virtualization solutions
Strong personal credibility, integrity, and communication skills are vital. This person must be responsive to others and willing to set aside his/her ego for the greater good of the Company.
Vice President of Operations
Operations | Garland, TX | Full Time
JOB DESCRIPTION
company is looking for an industry disruptor. As a telecom innovator, our company is focused on improving the speed and methods of developing and building communications networks.  Through deep engineering and supply chain expertise, and a technology-driven business model, we are dramatically reducing the cost to build the networks of the future.
The Vice President of Operations, reporting to the CEO, will provide functional leadership to the supply chain, engineering and account management teams. You will motivate, inspire, and work alongside your teams to guide and accelerate a steep growth curve.
We are an established company with a start-up culture; successful because we know how to shake things up, ask the difficult questions, and collaborate with our clients to break industry paradigms. Our employees embody our company values: teamwork, innovation, and self-directed initiative.
We seek a broadly developed and strategically-minded executive who has proven experience leading a world class operations organization. The VP-Ops will continue the infusion of Lean management practices, data-driven decision making, and entrepreneurial mindset into all facets of operations. 

Key responsibilities include:
Engage with C-level staff to formulate and execute company strategy
Embody and nurture an entrepreneurial approach to operational growth, driven by Agile principles and the development of autonomous teams
Scale teams and infrastructure to support rapid business growth
Drive decisions regarding overall engineering, account management, manufacturing and supply chain priorities, allocation of talent and finances, value of proposed projects, and effectiveness of manufacturing and supply chain performance
Establish metrics consistent with the company’s business objectives for innovation, quality and delivery
Cultivate and maintain external relationships with key customers; develop strategies to monitor and identify future market trends
The most critical success factors for this position are a candidate’s ability to be innovative, flexible, and regularly switch between strategic and tactical objectives.  Our company prides itself on constant adaption to rapidly changing needs of our customers and the technology landscape.  We run hard, and wouldn’t have it any other way.
HKS is a team of more than 1,400 architects, interior designers, urban designers, scientists, artists, anthropologists and other professionals working together across industries and across the globe to create places that delight, heal and stimulate peak performance. We have nurtured a culture of extraordinary people with curious and creative minds who are passionate about delivering elegant solutions that solve our clients’ challenges. Our research teams dig deep to discover processes and ideas that improve outcomes--then they share them freely for everyone’s benefit. In all we do, we are mindful of the fragility of all life and of the planet.
 
Our Dallas Headquarters is looking for a CIO who will be responsible for enhancing HKS’s business processes through improved technology that is aligned with the firm’s strategic and operational business goals. Works with the business stakeholders to understand the organizational needs and ensure the technology strategy and execution allows HKS to achieve a competitive advantage in the marketplace.
Responsibilities
Directs and oversees the strategic alignment of the IT organization, including enterprise business systems, enterprise infrastructure and support services organizations with the goals and objectives of the business
Responsible for planning and directing the budget, goals, policies and objectives for the IT organization
Monitors labor and expenditures and tracks against budget for all aspects of the department
Establish a responsive, service-focused IT organization with quality personnel to ensure initiatives are aligned with key business goals of the company
Evaluate the systems and services provided by IT and provide documented service level objectives for availability and recoverability, including providing 24x7 support for global operations as well as a structured management, communication and approval process for system changes
Establish and oversee a Project Management and IT Governance process that ensures initiatives are aligned with key business goals and meet defined objectives for ROI, Revenue, Profit and cost savings
Assess & renew data centers, networking, server and desktop infrastructure strategy including the security requirements, disaster recovery and business continuity
Perform an application rationalization and renewal process that identifies the various applications and services provided by IT, defines a roadmap for each application and focuses on consolidation, standardization, Integration and data ownership
Support Business Decision making using standard business intelligence and knowledge management tools such as dashboards and portals to ensure easier and quicker access to relevant data by the key decision makers
Ensure adherence to corporate and departmental standards and policies, review and approve project artifacts in accordance with project methodology and change management processes as well as enforcing the use of best practices and standards throughout the project lifecycle
Makes recommendations to Executive Management for improvement of HKS' Information Management environment
Participates on committees and special projects
 
Leadership
Adhere to all HKS values, processes, policies, standards and procedures 
Maintain a high level of customer service through good communication and can interact effectively with all levels of management, technical and non-technical (i.e. business users)
Relies on experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals
Performs a variety of tasksas assigned 
Have excellent problem solving and troubleshooting skills
A wide degree of creativity and latitude is expected
Bring a “Can-Do” results oriented attitude to a team that includes the desire and ability to learn
Desire to learn new technologies and new ways
Demonstrated leadership and personnel management skills
Solid understanding of the organization’s goals and objectives
Demonstrate integrity, respect, commitment to excellence, collaboration, agility and value diversity every day with every team member
Can interact effectively with all levels of management, technical and non-technical (i.e. businessstaff) 
Can explain requirements and technical scenarios to non-technical people
Have excellent problem solving and troubleshooting skills
Guide and mentors the staff onprojects and activities  
Ability to delegate effectively
Successful experience in assessing talent and in developing IT talent
Work well in a team environment with proven ability in successful team building
 
Technology Supported 
Microsoft Office 365/Sharepoint Online
Deltek Vision ERP
Sage Fixed Assets
Workday HRIS/Payroll
iCims Applicant Tracking
Tableau
ChromeRiver Expense Management
Vena Budgeting & Forecasting
Microsoft .Net Application Platform
Microsoft SQL Server  
Microsoft Office
Qualifications
Bachelor’sdegree in Information Systems or related field is required 
15+ years overall hands-on experience in Information technologyis required
10+ years of successful experience leading technology teams is required
Current comprehensive knowledge of information technology subjects and extensive knowledge of hardware and software
Experience with implementation of and enhancements of enterprise systems such as ERP and CRM systems, including effective integration of multiple data bases
Expertise with a variety of the concepts, practices, and procedures related toIT project management, portfolio management, IT Governance and Business Analysis
Expertise with a variety of the concepts, practices, and procedures related to technical infrastructure
Experience managing the project delivery and IT governance organization for an international company with multiple distributed locations
Experience managing business systems and technical infrastructure for an enterprise with 1000+ users
Experience in managing multiple complex projects which involve interaction with other systems and departments
Proven experience developing detailed business plans, project plans, test plans, estimating technology project efforts
Strong understanding of project lifecycle methodologies such as Agile / SCRUM or Project Methodology Institute (PMI)
Strong communication skills with ability to communicate with all levels of an organization
Must be able to accurately define business requirements and gain support from project stakeholders
Proven track record of motivating staff and dealing with diverse interpersonal relationships, skilled at maintaining focus of project teams to ensure meeting project objectives
Must be able to organize and facilitate meetings involving appropriate groups in relation to project activities
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
 #LI-AR1 
ob description
Bring your strategic vision and technical savviness to company and join our growing team of professionals passionate about the delivery of modern E-commerce. company is hiring for this CTO position to provide strategic direction for the development of company technology products and support company-wide application development.
This new position creates an exciting opportunity to lead and manage strategic planning for the company’s product development roadmap, execution of the roadmap and successful launch of new products through their full life cycle. This position will also lead and support overall software application development, testing and implementation for company enterprise-wide product portfolio.
The CTO is a member of Senior Leadership and will provide technical vision and strategic insight to grow the company through the use of technological resources. The successful contributor for this position will have a roll-up-the-sleeves work ethic and be close enough to the technology and the individual contributors that they will be able to lead product direction and engineering execution.
company is looking for the right person to fill this role, which means we are flexible as to geographic location from which this position can be based. company will consider qualified candidates from any part of the world.
If you enjoy variety and a challenge in your work, then this opportunity is right up your alley. Reporting to the CEO, you will collaborate with other department leaders and serve as an advisor of technologies that may improve company overall product efficiency and effectiveness.

Responsibilities

Strategy & Planning
·       In partnership with the company’s founders, identify opportunities and risks for delivering the company’s services as an E-commerce business, including identification of competitive services, opportunities for innovation, and assessment of marketplace obstacles and technical hurdles to the business success.
·       Identify technology trends and evolving social behavior that may support or impede the success of the business.
·       Evaluate and identify appropriate technology platforms (including web application frameworks and the deployment stack) for delivering the company’s services.
·       Lead strategic planning to achieve business goals by identifying and prioritizing development initiatives and setting timetables for the evaluation, development, and deployment of all web-based services.
·       Participate as a member of the senior management team in establishing governance processes of direction and control to ensure that objectives are achieved, risks are managed appropriately and the organization’s resources are used responsibly, particularly in the areas of software development, office networks and computers, and telecommunications.
·       Collaborate with the appropriate departments to assess and recommend technologies that support company organizational needs.
·       Establish a governance process that meets government, partner, and company expectations for customer information privacy.
·       Direct development and execution of an enterprise-wide information security plan that protects the confidentiality, integrity, and availability of the company’s data and servers.
·       Direct development and execution of an enterprise-wide disaster recovery and business continuity plan.
·       Communicate the company’s technology strategy to investors, management, staff, partners, customers, and stakeholders.
Operational Management
·       Maintain up-to-date knowledge of technology standards, industry trends, emerging technologies, and software development best practices by attending relevant conferences and reading widely (including reading your peers’ blogs!).
·       Define and communicate company values and standards for acquiring or developing systems, equipment, or software within the company.
·       Ensure that technology standards and best practices are maintained across the organization.
·       Share knowledge, mentor, and educate the organization’s investors, management, staff, partners, customers, and stakeholders with regard to the company’s technological vision, opportunities, and challenges.
·       Ensure company technical problems are resolved in a timely and cost-effective manner.
·       Develop, track, and control the development and deployment annual operating and capital budgets for purchasing, staffing, and operations.
·       Supervise recruitment, training, retention, and organization of all development staff in accordance with the company hiring process, personnel policies, and budget requirements.
·       Establish standards of performance and monitor conformance for staff (through performance review) and vendors (through service level agreements).
·       Ensure the company’s internal technological processes and customer-facing services comply with community expectations and applicable laws and regulations for privacy, security, and social responsibility.
·       Promote achievement of the company’s business goals within a context of community collaboration by developing policies for sharing software code, technological innovation, business processes, and other intellectual property.
·       Contribute to open source software development, standardization of technologies, and evolution of best practices by collaborating with peers outside the company, releasing code, presenting at conferences, and writing for publication (online or offline).

Position Requirements

Formal Education & Certification
·       BS in related field and at least 15 years experience in the Information Technology arena, at least 10 years management and strategic experience in this field or MBA/MS in related filed with 10 years experience, 7 of which must be managerial and strategic.
 
Knowledge & Experience
·       Demonstrated ability to envision web-based services that meet consumer needs or solve business problems.
·       10 years experience managing web application development.
·       3-5 years experience with startup companies.
·       Hands-on experience coding in more than one currently popular web application framework.
·       Familiar with more than one software development methodology.
·       Ability to discern user requirements and develop specifications.
·       Has contributed to one or more open source projects.
·       Knowledge PHP, MySQL, NoSQL, CSS, XHTML, one or more Javascript frameworks, and AJAX.
·       Knowledge of web standards.
·       Experience with UNIX system administration and web server configuration.
·       Knowledge of Internet protocols and RFC standards, database management systems, and revision control systems.
·       Familiarity with technical requirements of Internet marketing and search engine optimization.
·       Familiarity with information security vulnerabilities and risk management.
·       Familiarity with consumer privacy and payments industry compliance requirements.
·       Exposure to business theory, business process development, governance processes, management, budgeting, and administrative operations.

Personal Attributes
·       Proven leadership ability.
·       Ability to set and manage priorities judiciously.
·       Excellent written and oral communication skills.
·       Excellent interpersonal skills.
·       Ability to articulate ideas to both technical and non-technical audiences.
·       Exceptionally self-motivated and directed.
·       Keen attention to detail.
·       Superior analytical, evaluative, and problem-solving abilities.
·       Exceptional service orientation.
·       Ability to motivate in a team-oriented, collaborative environment.

Work Conditions
·       On-call availability 24/7 and overtime.
·       Sitting for extended periods of time.
·       Dexterity of hands and fingers (or skill with adaptive devices) to operate a computer keyboard, mouse, and other computing equipment.
The company-redacted.com IT Enterprise Data Service team is seeking an experienced Director of Software Engineering with an extensive background and experience in leading delivery of robust and scalable enterprise solutions. This is a senior leadership role reporting to the VP, IT Applications and will be responsible for delivering BI/Analytics/Big Data capabilities to the internal company-redacted business partners with a focus on consistency, scale, quality and operational excellence.
The Director, Software Engineering will lead a global team of 30+ software engineers through project initiation, execution, and deployment phases of the software delivery lifecycle. Providing guidance through their career progressions, this people and delivery leadership role is also responsible for effective executive stakeholder engagement. Directing work assignments, portfolio roadmaps, influencing the balance of scope-budget-timelines, strategic planning, and demonstrating agile expertise with functional-technical-operational processes are some of the other key capabilities for this role.
The Director, Software Engineering will be expected to understand the ongoing requirements of our business units and will help evolve our overall BI/Analytics/Big Data ecosystem to support new tools and design shifts that enable the business to be successful in a high-growth environment.
Responsibilities
Build, manage, multiply, coach and develop a team of outstanding individuals providing software development of BI/Analytics/Big Data solutions in support of transformational enterprise projects and capability enhancements.
Build strong relationships with key business stakeholders across multiple business units including data science teams and be their trusted advisor.
Provide oversight and leadership for the delivery of projects involving a variety of technologies (Wave, Business Objects, Informatica & Hadoop) and ensure that the implemented solutions align with and support business strategies and requirements.
Collaborate with vendors and industry consultants to continuously learn and identify opportunities to advance our strategy and operating model for supporting our business partners.
Look for opportunities to optimize engineering processes and frameworks that are followed for delivering solutions in an effort to increase productivity and reduce time to market.
Foster, facilitate, and furnish, timely decision-making across a broad network of stakeholders, delivery partners, and operational teams.
Collaborate with security, architecture, engineering, quality, support, experience, program, and infrastructure partners in coordinating the delivery of complex, multi-multi objectives.
Represent and lead diverse delivery functions in program/project core team and executive steering committee meetings.
Accountability for team integrity, product excellence, decision making, delivery estimates and roadmaps, career development, client communications, and project outcomes.


Required Skills & Experience
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, MIS, STEM, IT or related discipline or equivalent experience.
12+ years of professional experience in solution delivery, architecture, vendor management and people management.
Function independently and as part of a team under aggressive deadlines in a (really) fast-paced environment, convey a strong professional image, exhibit interest and positive attitude toward all assigned work, and strive for continued improvement.
Deep knowledge of tools that are used to implement BI/Analytics/Big Data solutions – Informatica, Business Objects, Hadoop, Alation, Domino, Tidal, Python, R, etc. Experience with the Einstein Analytics (aka Wave) highly beneficial.
Ability to work effectively and manage partnerships with all areas and members of the business as well as all levels of the organization.
Thought leadership, a curiosity of business and engineering processes and drive to keep pace with the new and emerging trends, technologies and innovations.
Experience with Agile/Scrum development methodologies Technical expertise and evidence of mastery in implementing BI/Analytics/Big Data solutions.
Experience in budgeting, project structuring, vendor and partner management, staff structuring, and negotiations.
Strong situational analysis, negotiation and decision-making abilities.
Excellent spoken and written communication as well as receptive listening skills, with the ability to present complex ideas in a clear, concise fashion to technical and non-technical audiences.
Impressive presentation skills and experience communicating and convincing audiences from analysts to C-suite.
Travel less than 20%.
Director of Cloud Operations
Full-time Permanent Position
Location: United States, Dallas

As a global leader in digital business transformation, Bizagi provides the power to deliver rapid process automation and ignite digital business transformation across the enterprise. Bizagi’ s digital business platform wraps around existing IT systems, giving organisations the immediate business agility and process orchestration required to compete in the digital economy.

Bizagi is rapidly expanding worldwide and is looking to recruit the best talent in the industry. We are truly passionate about our solutions and the market opportunity, and we are looking for like-minded people to join in our journey. 

Headquartered in England with operations in North America, Europe and Latin America and with a strong implementation partner network globally, Bizagi is a very fast-growing software business, seen as an innovator within the Business Process Management (BPM) market. Our vertical solutions and underlying platform help over 300 enterprise customers across all industries improve, automate and streamline their business processes.
 
What we are seeking

As the Director of Cloud Operations, you will be responsible for the continuous deployment of all Bizagi Cloud products running on Microsoft Azure.

We are seeking a visionary leader who possesses a high level of technical acumen, the ability to inspire, lead, and grow a multi-cultural global team.
 
Tasks & Responsibilities:
 
You will provide 24 X 7 operations for:
Bizagi Cloud Services
Disaster Recovery
Scanning and Archiving
Data Repository, and Remote Operations Services
 
Develop and oversee Network Operations, Event Management, Incident Management, Problem/Escalation Management, Configuration Management and Change Management Processes for all Bizagi Cloud Services.
 
Ensure successful backup and/or replication of Customer Data in a secure manner. Contribute to and enhance Security policies and procedures for Bizagi Cloud Services. Implement System Management Tools to provide monitoring and management of all Cloud infrastructures.
 
Define and report Key Performance Indicators to monitor process health; define and report Customer facing service metrics. Implement and oversee Security policy, monitoring, and guidelines for Bizagi Cloud Services. Conduct System Outage Analysis to prevent the re occurrence of incidents. Implement continuous improvement plans for all services and processes.

Directly manage assigned employee group.
 
Carry out management and supervisory responsibilities in accordance with the organization's policies and applicable laws.

Responsibilities include: interviewing, hiring, and training employees; planning, assigning, and directing work; appraising performance; rewarding and disciplining employees; addressing complaints and resolving problems
 
Skills and Experience
Bachelors degree in Information Management, Computer Science, or similar is an advantage


Ideally 5 years+ experience dealing with large complex information systems and in managing operations at a global scale


Experience with Azure is a must have


Must have strong cloud operations background


5 years+ experience of IT Service Management, data centre, server and storage management, virtualization, networking, systems management, and/or project management are recommended.


 
Essential:
Strong leadership, interpersonal, planning, and organization skills


Experience in designing and implementing scalable cloud-based Operations


Proven experience in running both multi-tenant and single tenant systems.


Solid understanding of Microsoft Azure technologies


Deep technical understanding of running SaaS/PaaS/cloud infrastructure


Proven experience with agile deployment models with high frequent cloud updates


DevOps experience


Proven experience in defining, implementing, and measuring high availability systems.


Strong understanding of SaaS/PaaS COGS modelling.


Possess a deep technical understanding of Cloud Security.


Proven track record of managing a 20+ team


Deep understanding of certification requirements such as SOC2, Fedramp, GDPR, ISO27001


Certification in ITIL and/or TOGAF


 
Desirable:
Exceptional customer service orientation and collaboration skills


Understanding of virtualization and global infrastructure, load balancing, networking, security and operations


Team-first outlook including building great working relationships with peers across functions


 
UMMARY OF RESPONSIBILITIES

The Vice President, Digital Operations and Performance Engineering is responsible for strategy, testing, performance engineering and operations of all digital and mobile platforms technology deployed at Neiman Marcus in support of its business strategy, including cloud applications, data center applications, and service monitoring. The position supports NeimanMarcus.com, as well as LastCall.Com, Bergdorfgoodman.com, and Horchow.com, which collectively represent more than $1B in web business.

The Vice President, Digital Operations and Performance Engineering will support applications in the cloud for search and browse, mobile applications (both customer and associate-facing), as well as web checkout on the ATG Platform in the data center. The position will manage internal and external partner resources, both onshore and offshore.


REPORTING RELATIONSHIPS

The Vice President, Digital Operations and Performance Engineering reports to the Vice President and Chief Technology Officer (CTO). He or she will lead a direct team of 11 with the following direct reports: Director, ATG; Director, Cloud Operations; Director, Testing Capability. The Vice President, Digital Operations and Performance Engineering will also oversee a team of 20 to 30 external partner resources. 


KEY STAKEHOLDERS

Key stakeholders for this position will include:

Software Development Organization
Neiman Marcus Online Business Teams


POSITION OVERVIEW

The Vice President, Digital Operations and Performance Engineering will partner with the CTO, Product Management, and Business IS Leads in defining strategy and execution for the digital platforms, supporting a dynamic and fast-paced seamless retail environment. He or she will build and maintain an efficient service delivery model leveraging Tier 1 partners and work with Enterprise Portfolio Management and Project Management Office to ensure effective planning and execution of initiatives.  The Vice President, Digital Operations and Performance Engineering will also implement effective spend management practices to identify opportunities for cost savings, and service quality improvement.  

The Vice President, Digital Operations and Performance Engineering will also establish a streamlined set of metrics against which to measure progress over time.

Responsibilities for the Vice President, Digital Operations and Performance Engineering will include the following:

Digital Operations Cloud and On-Prem (Web – Mobile/Desktop, Mobile Apps) 

The Vice President, Digital Operations and Performance Engineering is responsible for the overall day-to-day operations of managing Cloud Services including monitoring, incident resolution, problem management, configuration and change management, service desk, systems administration, security management and monitoring, capacity planning, availability management, and routine update of services. This position is responsible for various hosting solutions inclusive of a disaster recovery operation that includes annual restore testing at time of disaster recovery.

Roles and responsibilities include:
Provide advanced engineering support to production support teams for complex application performance and infrastructure issues.
Recruit, train, mentor and provide regular performance reviews for a team of cloud operations specialists.
Provide 24x7x365 operations for all digital platforms on-prem and in the cloud (AWS and other) cloud Develop processes to manage operations, assists in technical standards development, assists in architecture development, staffing and staff development, and leadership 
Implement appropriate System Management tools to provide monitoring and management of all cloud infrastructure.
Manage the implementation of new instances and sites into the various environments.
Define and report Key Performance Indicators and SLAs to monitor the health and performance of cloud services and process and overall service delivery; define and report customer-facing service metrics.
Provide communication through all tiers of support to ensure incidents are resolved expeditiously. 
Develop, oversee and perform Tier 2 Support, event management, incident management, problem management, configuration management and change management processes for all cloud services.
Implement and oversee security policy, monitoring, guidelines for cloud services. Conduct system outage analysis and prepare after action reports to prevent the reoccurrence of incidents.
Ensure the security of the Neiman Marcus hosting environments and related processes.
Working with the Release Management team, ensure that all changes to the production environments are documented, tested, and approved.

E-Commerce Operations 


The Vice President, Digital Operations and Performance Engineering is responsible for the overall day-to-day operations of managing the operations of the Oracle ATG E-Commerce Platform including monitoring, incident resolution, problem management, configuration and change management, service desk, systems administration, security management and monitoring, capacity planning, availability management, and routine update of services. 
Roles and responsibilities include:
Work with the Cloud Operations Team, the Infrastructure team and other stakeholders to design and implement scalable, best-in-class e-commerce environments to support the business requirements of Neiman Marcus.
Serve as the point of contact for all production issues and operational support status of Neiman Marcus e-commerce platform, including related internal and third-party applications and services that support the ecommerce platform.
Manage the incident response and resolution process.
Communicate effectively with e-commerce development teams, business partners, and IT partners to prioritize, mitigate, resolve and report on root-cause issues. 
Leverage deep functional knowledge to lead the team in triaging and escalate issues as appropriate for the business context. 
Work closely with the developers, release managers, and first-level service desk support team to facilitate acceptance and release of new systems and features. 
Deliver regular site performance reports daily, weekly and monthly.
Perform regularly scheduled load testing on production environments.
Track and gather data for measuring operational trends and identifying areas for improvement.
Maintain quality service by establishing and enforcing organizational standards.

Software Quality Assurance Management

The Vice President, Digital Operations and Performance Engineering is responsible for the managing and mentoring the SQA team, overseeing implementation of test automation frameworks, world-class testing methodology, and advanced reporting on test task trends.

Roles and responsibilities include:
Manage a team of Software Quality Assurance (SQA) Engineers and Customer Support Engineers.
Recruit, train, mentor and provide regular performance reviews for SQA team members.
Manage QA project execution to ensure adherence to budget, schedule, and scope, as well as dynamically respond to changes therein, specifically using Agile methodologies.
Assign duties to SQA and monitor in accordance with project plans and requirements.
Develop automated testing strategy using best practices, to include all Neiman Marcus platforms (e.g. web, mobile).
Working with other team members, contribute to the development of a Continuous Software Development & Integration process and Quality initiatives.
Provide required definition, development and deployment of the Neiman Marcus product quality assurance strategy, addressing all phases of product development.
Define test parameters, design tests, interpret test results and analyze test trends.
Provide effective communication regarding issues, objectives, initiatives and performance to plan.
Develop and manage quality assurance metrics for performance improvement of all teams.

Release Management 

The Vice President, Digital Operations and Performance Engineering is responsible for coordinating release/change management across multiple environments (development through production) ensuring that software builds ranging from ad hoc break-fixes to scheduled major releases are appropriately planned while ensuring that all environments support needs are adequately maintained and that corporate compliance requirements are met. Drive the move from traditional application managed services ITIL model to continuous integration and continuous delivery-based processes and tools for deployment and releases. 

Roles and responsibilities include:
Manage a team of Release Management Engineers.
Recruit, train, mentor and provide regular performance reviews for Release Management team members.
Using best practices, lead the effort for defining and developing the strategic direction for Release Management and Continuous Integration.
Lead the effort for defining the strategic direction for Release Management and Continuous Integration. 
Implement and manage release processes for software code through development, testing, QA, and production environments. Help define new policies, procedures and workflows for the Software Release Management workspace.
Work with other teams and stakeholders to ensure coordinating and testing of all modifications to all environments. This includes but is not limited to: hardware changes; operating system changes, upgrades, and security patches; third party products; and all core services.
Manage risks that may affect release scope, schedule, and quality.
Conduct Release Readiness reviews, Milestone Reviews, and Business Go/No-Go reviews.
Develop any disaster or contingency plans for major releases.
Research new software development and configuration management methodologies and technologies and analyzes their application to current configuration management needs.
Provide appropriate status reports to stakeholders on a regular basis.

Enterprise Application Monitoring Strategy & Implementation  

The Vice President, Digital Operations and Performance Engineering is responsible for building out robust monitoring of requirements to proactively respond to issues impacting the customer experience across NMG Digital properties. This role will also champion creating a center of excellence for enterprise wide application monitoring strategy and implementation.
 
We expect continuous monitoring of real-time site performance and availability through a combination of synthetic transactions, site analytics, and business trends. Identifies the appropriate tools, such as Dynatrace, Splunk, Tealeaf, etc., to accomplish the mission. The successful candidate will not only serve the digital thought leader but will also become the organization’s enterprise performance engineering and monitoring change agent.

Roles and responsibilities include: 
Provide performance engineering standards and instrumentation and monitoring frameworks to development to minimize re-work and optimize first time design and development activities. 
Perform release performance testing against modeled production loads; engages in resolving as needed. 
Provide advanced engineering support to development and production support teams for complex application performance and infrastructure issues. 
Train the development and operations teams on instrumentation and monitoring Director, and team will triage critical incidents in production as needed. 
Assist in technical standards development, assists in architecture development, staffing and staff development, and leadership. 
Implement appropriate System Management tools to provide monitoring and management of the site including but not limited to, cloud infrastructure and the Oracle ATG E-Commerce Platform. 
Define and report Key Performance Indicators and SLAs to monitor the health and performance of cloud services and process and overall service delivery; define and report customer-facing service metrics.
Recruit, train, mentor and provide regular performance reviews for a team of performance and monitoring engineers


KNOWLEDGE, ABILITIES, SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE

At least 15 years of technology experience in position of increasing levels of responsibility.
Experience with Cloud computing, including IaaS, PaaS, SaaS concepts and the ability to articulate these concepts to technical and non-technical audiences.
AWS experience, compute, storage and content delivery, databases and networking – supporting Development, Test, SQA, and Production environments.
Knowledge or experience with DevOps methodologies and how to implement these in a new organization. 
Track record of success maturing IT services, improving IT security and compliance, as well as managing IT costs.
Knowledge or experience with Scalable Agile Frameworks.
Track record of success managing digital operations and performance engineering in a high-performing web environment integrating cloud-native and legacy applications.
Proven ability to implement processes and systems to proactively manage incidents and reduce their occurrence.
Track record of success communicating cross-functionally (e.g., with marketing, engineering, etc.) to gain alignment on best decisions for web site from a business and performance perspective and for determining and negotiating the right trade-offs.
Experience deploying applications in the cloud and utilizing cloud monitoring solutions.
Experience interviewing, hiring, and training employees; planning, assigning, and directing work; appraising performance; rewarding and disciplining employees; addressing complaints and resolving problems.
Retail experience preferred, but not required.


PERSONAL CHARACTERISTICS

The ideal candidate will possess the following performance and personal characteristics: 
Influences effectively without direct authority, balancing between competing priorities while remaining flexible and creative.
Strong ability to build and strengthen team engagement and align resources to strategy, key tactics and measures; proven ability to establish clear aligned goals and objectives with a timely feedback loop.
Outstanding written and verbal communication skills with the ability to work up, down and across organizational levels.
Strong business acumen, operations and problem-solving skills, along with the ability to assess current practices, identify opportunities for improvement, build consensus and drive the implementation of related changes.

EDUCATION & TRAINING
An undergraduate degree in Information Technology or equivalent experience is required and an advanced degree is preferred.


Define the technical vision and build the technical product roadmap from launch to scale; including defining long-term goals and strategies
Identify opportunities and challenges in the marketplace and technological landscape, with constant evaluation of technological advancements to mitigate against obstacles and drive success
Provide expert technical guidance and recommendations to all functional areas, including strategy, operations, sales and product
Devise architectural approaches to feature and infrastructure development to provide a framework for development team Execution
Drive continuous product improvement
Evaluate and identify appropriate technology platforms to drive growth, profitability and company value
Effectively align resources to achieve key business priorities, including appropriate scope, high quality and timely product releases
Establish a venture-wide information security plan to ensure security of all assets and data
Develop and maintain an venture-wide disaster recovery and continuity plan
Build and scale an efficient and agile end-to-end application infrastructure, with best practices in software delivery
Define and implement a consistent and repeatable process for quality assurance across all areas of organization and product build
Work with development team to design solution architecture for specific feature or infrastructure needs
Attract and retain a world-class engineering team
Cultivate a high-performing, innovative, one-team culture
Evangelize technical vision and strategy internally and externally

What you’ll need

10+ years’ experience in software engineering, with 5+ in the context of a high growth tech company using agile methods
Proven track record of ability to scale and build large engineering teams
Proven track record of bringing highly-rated mobile applications to market in a startup environment
An entrepreneurial spirit and ability to operate independently


Experience with software best practices in

Distributed Systems
Performance optimization techniques
Cloud security, general Information Security – People, Process and Tooling – securing cloud-native applications and platforms, systems and data security.
Software engineering practices (e.g. Agile software development, test-driven development, unit testing, code reviews, design documentation, etc.)
Native and/or hybrid mobile development (e.g.: iOS, Android, PhoneGap, ionic, etc.)


Working knowledge of

Object oriented design & development, building backend applications with REST API services using Java, Node.js
Designing and developing service-based architectures (micro-services architecture a plus) & integration with existing systems/applications (legacy and API) & 3rd party systems.
Designing data persistence and caching concepts using both SQL and NoSQL DBMS (e.g.: MySQL, MongoDB, Cassandra, Redis, etc.)
CI/CD automation and Cloud-native development experience E.g. setup, configure and maintain your own build, DEV/QA environment & CI/CD pipeline (we use AWS & Docker)
Container & container orchestration technologies (e.g.: Docker, Kubernetes)


Minimum requirements

The CIO is responsible for all aspects of the company’s information
technology functions; including Corporate IT, Software Development, and
Global Enterprise Security.
The CIO will lead the planning and deployment of enterprise IT systems in
support of company operations in order to ensure the highest level of
effectiveness with business processes, internal and external constituents
experiences, cost effectiveness, business continuity and the ongoing
achievement of the company’s objectives. It is critical maintain and
develop business partnerships that are key to the organization’s success,
while rallying the IT team.
The primary objectives for the role are to:
Enhance employee productivity through the use of technology.
Leverage technology to enhance and digitize the customer
experience
Enhance and rationalize back-office applications to support our
high growth

Key Responsibilities

The ideal candidate will fill a visible, strategic, and high-impact
leadership role within the organization.
He or she will have significant depth in technology and business
domains and will have a proven track record of developing a bold
strategic agenda, merger and acquisition integration, driving the
IT strategy and building a high-performance team to deliver
results which are consistent with business objectives.
The ideal candidate will have excellent leadership skills that
leverage the capabilities of peers, business partners, associates
and customers.
He or she will provide a high-energy, enthusiastic and passionate
dimension to the IT function and to the entire organization.
To be successful, the CIO must collaborate closely with Executive
Leadership Team peers and the Board of Directors to ensure the
seamless deployment of all enterprise IT applications and
supporting infrastructure necessary to achieve current and future
business objectives.

Page 3 of 5 CIO – Rackspace

Develop strategic plans and implement the objectives of the
information technology needs of the company to ensure the IT
capabilities are responsive to the needs of the company's growth
and objectives.
Lead a global IT team of approximately 500 (including technical
support) in a fast-paced, dynamic environment.
Provide vision to develop and establish IT operating policies and
approaches for a complex computing environment encompassing
networking infrastructure, Cloud based applications, mobile
applications and business computing platforms.
Identify emerging information technologies to be assimilated,
integrated, and introduced within the company.
Assess new computing technologies to determine potential value
for the company.
Evaluate overall operations of computing and information
technology functions and recommend enhancements.
Provide vision, guidance and counsel to executive leadership on
strategic systems conversions and integrations in support of
business goals and objectives.
Prepare enterprise objectives and budgets to facilitate the orderly
and efficient capture, storage, processing, and dissemination of
information.
Review and approve major contracts for computing and
information technology services and equipment.
Ensure the security of the information systems, communication
lines, and equipment.
Oversee the development, design, and implementation of new
applications and changes to existing systems and software
packages.
Establish company infrastructure to support and guide individual
divisions, departments, and sites in computing and information
technology efforts.
Attract, develop and train a strong IT organization in support of
business objectives’ drive a culture of performance and
accountability within the IT department.
Business value: Measure against revenue growth, cost reduction,
and cost avoidance.
Create a common taxonomy of tailored metrics around these
three areas.
Improve customer and brand experience while working
collaboratively with the CMO.
Velocity & Quality of idea-to-offer cycle: with increasing change
in business models and shifts in technology; speed becomes
priority
Provide Fanatical Support® to internal employees
Key areas of focus for this role:
Core IT leadership and vision: infrastructure, application
development, and security.
Energize the vision for digital transformation.

Page 4 of 5 CIO – Rackspace

Acquisition integration: not just IT systems but business processes
and workflows.
Business continuity:
identify all the key business processes and unify the organization
on a single platform.
Security:
an initiative with strict needs as the company sells into
multinational markets.
Represent Rackspace in our customer markets.

Skills, Experience &
Qualifications

15 years + IT executive leadership positions
Experience in the high-tech sector is preferred
BS/BA Technology/Engineering, advanced degree desired
Visionary leadership and broad knowledge of technology including
network infrastructure, cloud-based applications, security,
business and ERP applications
The ability to develop and communicate an IT vision that inspires
and motivate IT staff and aligns to the business strategy.
Experience successfully leading multiple complex systems
integrations projects.
Ability to inspire people and the ability to successfully plan,
delegate and execute large, complex IT initiatives.
Must have strong client facing experience.
Ability to instill confidence in the business and demonstrate the
business value of IT.
Excellent analytical, strategic conceptual thinking, strategic
planning and execution skills.
Strong business acumen including industry, domain-specific
knowledge of the enterprise and its business units.
Deep understanding of current and emerging technologies and how
enterprises are employing them to drive business growth and
customer experience.
Demonstrated ability to develop and execute a strategic people
plan that ensures that the right people are in the right roles at the
right time and that employees are highly engaged and satisfied.
Ability to identify and leverage resources internally and externally
to the enterprise to enhance capabilities that drive digital
business.
Ability to drive organizational change and build capabilities that
effectively balance the needs between continuously exploiting
capabilities to optimize operational efficiency and delivering
innovative and agile IT solutions to enable the business to explore
digital business opportunities.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills, including the
ability to explain digital concepts and technologies to business
leaders, and business concepts to the IT workforce.

The successful candidate will enjoy the opportunity to:

Page 5 of 5 CIO – Rackspace
What makes this
opportunity
compelling?

Play a critical leadership role one of the IT sector’s most exciting
and high growth companies.
Be a member of a highly strategic and visionary senior leadership
team.
Leverage technology for direct business impact.
Join a fast-paced, dynamic culture that is rooted in collegiality
and respect.
Build and lead a high performing team.
 10 to 15+ years in the domain of Security & Risk Management 
• Been a Security Consultant in the Security & Risk Management consulting domain for a minimum of 5 Years. 
• Specialisation in the domain of Cloud Security Architecture Consulting 
• Designing and/or implementing IT & Cloud Security Controls in an enterprise 
• Carried out Risk Assessments related to Cyber Security Posture of Enterprises, 
• Risk Assessments and Gap Analysis of Networks, Cloud, Data Center infrastructure w.r.t standard frameworks like ISO27K1, PCI DSS, NIST frameworks. 
• Defining and designing Cyber Risk Management programs and strategies based on frameworks like ISO27K1, PCI DSS, NIST frameworks. 
• Planned, Defined and Led IT Assessment & Planning activities for business initiatives 
• Defined, Designed and delivered initiatives for (Re)Architecting and (Re)Engineering of Controls to enhance the Security Posture of the enterprise in Private, Hybrid & / or Public Clouds 
• Defined, Designed and delivered Process (Re)Engineering initiatives of key processes related to Security Management leading to Process Improvement and Operational Reviews 
• Strong understanding of IT infrastructure concepts and architectures, including IT network, operating system, service management etc 
• Strong understanding of the OSI model 
• Carried out 'Needs Assessment' and worked out business cases presenting ROI, Cost Benefit Analysis etc 
• Strong domain expertise and deep understanding of four or more of following areas: 
• Cyber Risk Management Strategy & harmonisation with industry frameworks like NIST etc 
• Cyber Security and Cyber Defense 
• Security Architecture 
• Data Privacy & Governance 
• Application security/SDLC 
• Third party risk management 
• Cloud Risks Management 
• Strong experience in technology-based tools or methodologies to review, design and/or implement enterprise programs 
• All candidates must have full travel mobility 
 
Role & Responsibilities
• Responsible to build relationship with all the key stakeholders, both from Wipro's Ecosystem and the Client Ecosystem. 
• Advise Clients in developing Cloud [Private, Hybrid & Public] risk management strategies and multi-year implementation and remediation programs based on business priorities and risks to address Cyber Security, Cyber Defense and Business needs of the enterprise, 
• Advise clients in developing and tailoring of approaches, methods and tools to support cyber risk programs and initiatives 
• Responsible to Define information security strategies, including guiding principles and future state vision, ensuring that the strategic objectives are aligned with business goals 
• Responsible to Developing and embedding IT security systems architecture to support that strategy 
• Assessment of security architecture, analysis of issues and development of recommendations for their resolution 
• Defining key initiatives that will be incorporated in any strategic roadmap, including key drivers, benefits, objectives and deliverables, in collaboration with business and IT stakeholders 
• Responsible to develop and evangelise value propositions, 
• Responsible to build, produce and present reports and other client deliverable, as required. 
• The Senior Cloud Architect will serve as the subject matter expert for Cloud Transformation and is expected to have a deep understanding of cloud architecture, adoption patterns for Amazon Web services / Azure, Security best practices for AWS / Azure, and recommendations aligned to frameworks from Cloud Security Alliance, SANS 20 and NIST in this multi-geography deployment of a major transformation program. 
• The Senior Cloud Security Architect will work with IT analysis, development teams and business management to identify strategic Cloud adoption requirements and produce or contribute to cloud consumption, strategy, and roadmap and architecture artefacts. 
• Assesses business viability of new cloud adoption requirements. Consults with other architects and senior level IT managers to assess and evaluate current Cloud strategies and related security requirements. 
• Leads development of Cloud Architecture principles to support business goals. Consults with systems engineers and architects to develop Cloud consumption standards for the business. 
• Communicates various design options related to business risks and influences decision making aided with various architecture tools and models. 
 
Responsibilities to Practice development
• Work with the Consulting head / Managing Partner to define new strategies, develop and evangelise value propositions to existing and new clients 
• Responsible for articulation and publication of Whitepapers, Blogs, Articles etc periodically, based on the norms set. 
• Responsible for building proposals, presentations for his / her own consulting engagements 
• Responsible for evangelising value propositions from the larger CRS practice 
• Responsible for identifying and nurturing cross-sell and up-sell opportunities to build business. 
 
Qualifications:
• Analytical skills required to conduct technology and risk assessments, gap analysis, identifying (re)engineering or (re)architecting initiatives 
• Demonstrated experience in defining and deploying cyber security strategies and programs for enterprises 
• Proven track record in defining and implementing cyber risk management structures, governance models, organizational transformations in the areas of cyber security management 
• Strong experience in technology-based tools or methodologies to review, design and/or implement enterprise programs 
• Effective time management skills by completing assignments within budgets and calendar schedules; identify opportunities to improve engagement profitability 
• Problem solving skills to generate innovated ideas and challenge the status quo 
• Knowledge of architecture methodologies, standards, frameworks and tools (e.g. TOGAF, Zachman, COBIT, UML) 
• Two or More Certifications CISSP, CISA, CCNP, CRISC, C:CISO etc is a must 
• Frequent Travel on Consulting engagements is a must. 
 
Strong interpersonal and communication skills required to:
• Promote positive working relationships with diverse personalities/roles at all levels in the firm and among clients 
• Ability to communicate effectively both verbally and through written material 
• Explain and interpret technical information to non-IT people 
 The Vice President, Site Reliability Engineering is responsible for the reliability and stability of DigitalOptometrics’ offerings. This newly created role will own the SaaS reliability vision for the company, driving continuous improvement through a combination of development and operations initiatives as well as process excellence. The position has full solid-line responsibility for operations of SaaS offerings including the deployment, management, monitoring, reporting, troubleshooting, and repair of production systems. The position also has solid-line responsibility for cloud engineering developers as well as dotted-line influence over software engineers in the product development groups. This position also works closely with other functional teams such as product management and customer success to ensure that DigitalOptometrics SaaS offerings meet or exceed business objectives and demands of ever-rising customer expectations. Responsibilities include establishing and maintaining a rigorous process of continuous improvement, devising solution plans that cross functional areas, meeting SLA requirements, enabling the company to adopt a more aggressive SLA, managing personnel, and improving processes rigor. This position manages a professional, highly skilled staff.
Responsibilities:
Drives strategic goals of growth and profitability of our SaaS business via owning, implementing, and safeguarding a state-of-the-art site reliability vision.
Partners with Product Management and Engineering leaders to ensure that operational and reliability requirements are clearly articulated and integrated into the product roadmap.
Full responsibility for achieving DigitalOptometrics’ contractual SLA requirements.
Implements a world-class continuous improvement program that includes in-depth root-cause analysis, solution identification and implementation, and ongoing conformance to policy.
Responsible for risk assessment and management including proactively identifying, communicating, and mitigating risks associated with ongoing operations and planned releases.
Solid line responsibility for the SaaS Operations and Cloud Engineering functions which includes financial management responsibility covering financial planning, budget management and attainment of financial objectives. Identifies and assesses available options and understands costs, benefits, and risks associated with alternative approaches.
Responsible for process development and internal documentation for all SaaS applications. Analyzes current processes, documentation, tools, and methodologies and leads ongoing refinement to achieve continuous cycles of improvement. Prepares and presents proposals for SRE strategy and direction.
Plans and executes projects in support of the SRE objectives, and assures projects are delivered with high quality, on time, and within budget. Clearly defines scope, objectives and approach for each project. Develops a Master Project Plan encompassing all key initiatives, considering dependencies, resources, risk mitigation and business priorities. Delivers executive level presentations, communicating the master plan to senior management.
Helps define evolutionary and revolutionary changes to system architecture to improve system performance and scale.
Responsible for all components of the production data centers and public cloud regions including the management and operations of customer facing applications and websites.
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field (Master’s Degree preferred)
Minimum of 10 years’ experience in senior management (director level or higher) of large-scale web application operations and administration in a 24/7/365 environment in a self-hosted or co-located data center
Critical Skills/Competencies:
Very strong leadership skills
In depth knowledge of technical components of SaaS operations, including servers, databases, operating systems, networks, data centers, monitoring tools, etc.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills, ability to communicate effectively with people in technical and non-technical roles
Strong conflict resolution competence
SaaS experience from a self-hosted or co-located data center is a must. Participation in a 24x7 on-call environment, requiring the knowledge of managing 24x7 environments
Microsoft Azure experience a must
Experience building and managing a mature Release Engineering function that supports highly automated continuous integration and deployment capabilities into both co-located data centers and Microsoft Azure using best of breed processes and tools
Proven success developing and communicating a business vision and strategic plans
Experience with and deep knowledge of SSAE16 SOC2 audits and compliance
Experience with the use and implementation of monitoring and management frameworks, specifically for cloud environments
Experience managing a team of Site Reliability Engineers
Experience leading development teams
Extensive experience developing and executing a structured change management processes for highly available environments
Industry knowledge and awareness of best practices, trends, and latest features of Internet, SaaS, and Cloud delivered applications
Strong commitment to customer service and satisfaction, and excellent customer facing presence
Experience with direct customer interaction
Strong follow-through, focused and detailed oriented
Must have strong project management knowledge and experience (PMP certification is a plus)
THE IDEAL CANDIDATE:
has strong leadership skills. Enjoys digging in on detailed technical challenges and can still get “their hands dirty,” Will spend most of their time in a management capacity and know-how to inspire teams to bring an industry-leading product to life.
has 8+ years of relevant experience and a bachelor's degree in Computer Science or another relevant engineering discipline.
has at least one stint in a leadership position where the team grew from a few to several dozen and survived to tell the story.
has taken a product to market
has the ability to identify issues and remove any obstacles for their team that are getting in the way of success.
is self-assured and confident but not arrogant and will drive success. Comfortable asking questions when they don’t know something.
prefers getting direct feedback; has demonstrated the ability to give direct feedback and know how to do it so it is well received.
when things get ugly, do not go their way or they made a poor decision, they’ve got experience in staying calm and focused on addressing the problem.
prides themselves on going to school on the latest technologies and has experience introducing them into modern technical architectures.
understands that great engineering teams are built upon relationships, just as much as they are built on awesome code.
TECHNICAL REQUIREMENTS:
Has Experience with .NET C# and SQL language.
Has Experience with systems architecture is required.
Has Knowledge/experience in transitioning from local serves to cloud servers.
Has Experience with high-level cybersecurity.
RESPONSIBILITIES: 
Partners with the CEO and overall company leadership/steering committee to bring the best out of the engineering organization to accomplish ambitious goals.
Collaborate with the CEO to construct a meaningful long-term technical and cultural vision, working closely with the team to set pragmatic goals to deliver it.
Will recruit, hire and manage the development team both full time and project based to meet the overall company goals and timelines.
Lead and mentor a cross-functional team of Software Engineers and Tech Leads, covering a diverse set of technology problem domains, including Platform as a Service tooling and infrastructure automation, back-end software architecture and microservices design, distributed and event-driven systems design, and application development.
Provide feedback and guidance to the development teams on their self-organized Objectives and Key Results to ensure that they tie to the overall objectives of the company. And you will be diligent about establishing and monitoring the key metrics to course correct and keep everyone on track.
Architect, plan and direct engineering efforts in partnership with product and business team’s direction and product goals. Lead key engineering projects, initiatives and processes with a focus on continual speed and efficiency improvements.
Ensure technology platforms scale effectively, perform well with growth and that products are released with minimal quality issues.
Represent tech team in product development requirements, resource estimation, and scheduling.
Help prioritize Engineering activities in line with projected costs and benefits.
Partner with executive colleagues to define and deliver the technical vision for the platform.
Optimistic with strong balance between vision, strategy and GSD.
his highly visible role will report to the COO/CFO. The CIO has stewardship for developing and executing the enterprise wide IT strategy, and to ensure its alignment with Mspark’s overall business strategy and the delivery of capabilities required to achieve business success.
As a member of the senior leadership team, the Chief Information Officer champions the use of information and technology in overall enterprise business strategy development and design. The CIO is responsible for leading the IT organization, developing, and implementing a strategic technology plan for Mspark and participating as a member of the senior leadership team. The CIO has overall responsibility and accountability for the people, processes, data security and technology that make up IT infrastructure, applications, and cybersecurity and for ensuring that the technology infrastructure is reliable, maintainable, scalable, flexible, and secure. The CIO will lead the future vision by leveraging information and technology to develop competitive advantages for Mspark, as well as, handling the day-to-day blocking and tackling. To be successful in this role, the CIO must be willing to get involved in the tactical day-to-day work as needed to help the team.
Mspark’s company culture is very collaborative and entrepreneurial, “family” oriented with a “no jerks at work” unofficial policy and with Associates that are adaptable to change. Success here is performance-and results- based and people are rewarded for getting the job done. This position requires a seasoned IT leader who can identify, develop, lead and retain a strong organization filled with A-Players who can help achieve the company’s long-term growth and profit goals by superbly leading the vision and executing the IT strategy. The best candidates will be readers and thinkers and tinkerers who can react to emerging consumer signals and seize the moment in the service of Company’s mission. You trigger emotions that move people to action.
Key Responsibilities and Deliverables
Sets the vision and mission of the IT organization to foster a business-oriented, secure, digital-ready culture and mindset.
Establish and maintain collaborative, supportive, open and professional working relationships with C-level executives and other leaders.
Leads the development and execution of the IT strategic roadmap. Ensures its alignment with the enterprise’s strategic planning process, and the resulting business strategy, budget, and plans.
Acts as a trusted advisor and builds and maintains relationships with other C-level executives and business unit leaders to develop a clear understanding of business needs. Ensures cost-effective delivery of IT services to meet those needs and responds with agility to changing business priorities.
Collaborates with executive leadership and business partners to define vision and execute the digital business strategy. Participates in and contributes to the assessment of external digital opportunities and threats, and internal technology capabilities required to achieve desired competitive positioning.
Remains current on new technologies, architecture and platforms, and provides enterprise wide direction on the use of emerging technologies that meet the needs of the enterprise’s digital business strategy.
Acts as a thought leader on emerging digital business models and technologies. Provides strategic direction in the IT organization’s innovation efforts and role in experimenting with new solutions to take advantage of those opportunities in the fulfillment of the enterprise’s digital business strategy.
Provides leadership and perspective on cloud technologies; coaches and encourages the use of cloud tools to optimize infrastructure reliability and spend.
Oversee the development and maintenance of effective cybersecurity policy, incident response plans, disaster recovery policies and standards to align with enterprise business continuity goals. Coordinate the development and implementation plans and procedures to ensure that business critical services are recovered in the event of a security issue.
Partners with HR to continually look for leading-edge and innovative solutions to the recruitment, development and retention of digital, security, and IT talent.
Develops and maintains an IT workforce with the appropriate mix of business knowledge, skills and competencies. Balances the need for growing the agility required to achieve digital business objectives, with ensuring the core IT functions are reliable, stable and efficient.
Leads the establishment and execution of a digital workplace strategy that enables the development of digital dexterity in the workforce. Ensures employees have the tools and work environment to be more engaged, productive and effective.
Acts as a champion and change agent in leading the organizational changes required to create and sustain enterprise digital capabilities. Partners with other leaders to drive culture change in support of digital business transformation.
Directs the design and implementation of IT’s operating model, organizational structure, and governance process. Uses influencing and negotiation skills to create synergies across the enterprise to enable cost-effective and innovative shared solutions in achievement of business goals.
Provides strategic direction and oversight for the design, development, operation and support of IT systems and programs that fulfill the needs of the business, including enterprise architecture management, application management, security and risk management, and infrastructure and operations support management.
Enhances IT’s capabilities by leveraging a multitude of resources, both internally and externally.
Directs the development of the IT sourcing strategy and provides executive oversight for strategic vendor and partner relationship management. Manages the growing adoption of mobile, SaaS, PaaS, IaaS, and other emerging technologies.
Serves on enterprise planning and policymaking committees. Drives the development of enterprise technology standards, governance processes and performance metrics to ensure IT delivers value to the enterprise.
Provides leadership, coaching and direction to the IT leadership team and staff.
Insure customer value and technology experience through collaboration with business leaders during product development.
Develops and controls annual operating and capital expenditure budget for IT to ensure the budget is consistent with the enterprise’s overall strategic objectives and is within plan.
Candidate Qualifications
The successful candidate will be an accomplished contemporary information technology executive with a minimum of 15-years of relevant experience in managing technology teams and budgets for technology services delivery, with experience managing technology infrastructure, cybersecurity, data analytics/business intelligence, and application development. You’ll need to be well-versed in the use of contemporary technologies, and have built and executed strategic technology roadmaps for mid-market service companies. Your experience should include assignments as VP of IT/CTO equivalent of a stand-alone business or significant division of a large company reporting to the CEO, COO or CFO of a stand-alone company or of a large division.
 Preferred Qualifications
Experience leading engineering recruiting processes, setting standards for hires and maintaining high-quality candidate pipeline with hands-on responsibility
10 years of experience in a software development/engineering role
7 years of experience in management or a leadership role, leading a team of 15+ individuals either direct or matrixed, including experience leading a remote team
Bachelor's degree in engineering, computer science or a related field
Experience in cloud infrastructure, building at scale and test automation
Excellent leadership, team building and management skills
Ability to be encouraging to team and staff; ability to mentor and lead
Ability to align multiple strategies and ideas
Confidence in producing and presenting work to various stakeholders
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Ability to align multiple strategies and ideas
In-depth understanding of the industry
Strict adherence to the company philosophy, mission statement and sales goals
Excellent analytical and time-management skills
Knowledge of CRM tools such as company-redacted, VinSolutions, Elead, DealerSocket and Dominion Sales Center
Knowledge of finance tools such as RouteOne and DealerTrack
Experience with Cox Automotive Group, Reynolds & Reynolds, CDK Global and/or Vista Equity Partners
Knowledge of digital tools such as Roadster, Shift, AutoFi and AutoGravity


Job Summary
 
The Chief Technology Officer oversees all company technology and technological resources related to Rock Connections Automotive and our advertising and business operations initiatives. They will establish Rock Connections Automotive technology vision, strategies and plans for growth.
 
This team member has a strong technical background in building to current and future scale, development, automation, cloud infrastructure, the software development life cycle and experience in the digital media industry, including programmatic platforms. The Chief Technology Officer will focus on maintaining and improving all technological issues in the company.
 
Responsibilities
Set the company technical vision and oversee development for Rock Connections Automotive and the company's network
Partner with various teams throughout the organization to prioritize engineering efforts and deliver on the strategic growth vision
Develop strategic plans and set timelines for evaluation, development and deployment of all technical, web and mobile services
Identify opportunities for network, web and mobile services, internally and externally
Collaborate with team leaders, marketing, production and operations as advisor of all technologies involved with the company
Collaborate and provide leadership with key network infrastructure partners to maintain network health and growth
Ensure technology standards and best practices are met
Define objectives and performance measurements for the technology team and its subsets
Maintain and optimize software development process and setting objectives for process
Mentor and grow team members
Establish software development process and set objectives for process
Review time frames and budgets
Oversee hiring across technology department
Share technological visions, opportunities and risks company wide
Study current and new industry trends, technologies and software development
Represent the company at conferences, industry and networking events
Maintain network security with the IT team
Ensure company's technological processes and service comply with all requirements, laws and regulations
Provide leadership in a fashion that supports Rock Connections’ culture and values
Develop and implement disaster and emergency recovery plans
Define company standards for systems, equipment and software
Study information processing systems to evaluate effectiveness and make recommendations for improvement
Oversee buy vs. build decisions and perform diligence on potential technology partners
 
The Chief Information Officer, or CIO, serves as iCIMS’ lead Information Technology (IT) decision-maker and is responsible for strategy, design, implementation, and utilization of technology and data. The CIO analyzes how these technologies create business value while improving existing business processes, efficiencies, organization capabilities, and integrates systems to realize those benefits and/or improvements. The CIO is required to remain innovative in design and stay informed of all industry trends. The CIO must be able to convey technical concepts to iCIMS’ business community in a manner understood by non-technical Associates. Travel should be anticipated and will vary depending upon business requirements. This position reports to the Chief Financial Officer. iCIMS is a private equity-backed company.
=
Responsibilities:
 
Strategic Vision
• Creates and executes a clear strategic vision that leads and drives the accomplishment of business objectives and value through the application of technology, automation, and data.
• Develop long-term and short-term IT and Data strategy for the company. Select and implement suitable technology to streamline all internal operations and help optimize their strategic benefits.
• Bring clarity and direction to strategic business decisions enabling the company to scale globally and ensuring ROI for all investments.
• Identify changes for the department’s technology systems and applications and develops an overall strategy to meet the Company’s needs and goals and recommend systems software, applications, and hardware necessary for the successful integration of information systems.
• Continuously review IT plans and strategic direction and recommend changes as necessary to ensure continued alignment with the changing business needs of the organization.
• Define and adjust IT standards and technologies as needed based on changes to business processes and market influences ensuring performance reliability and process efficiency.
• Monitor changes or advancements in technology to discover ways the company can gain competitive advantage
• Develop long-term and short-term IT strategy for the company. Select and implement suitable technology to streamline all internal operations and help optimize their strategic benefits. Bring clarity and direction to strategic business decisions enabling immediate savings and the right investment assuring future, sustainable growth.
• Direct Information Technology’s Disaster Recovery/Business Continuation to ensure continuity of critical business functions and minimize information loss in the event of power outages, weather catastrophes, software, hardware failures, and/or other disasters or disruptions to the Company’s information systems and services.
• Establish a strategy to bring Information Security team to a public company level
 
Operational Excellence
• Plans defines, directs, and leads the execution of information systems and data strategy, as well as manages the day-to-day operations of governance, innovation, security, compliance, operations, infrastructure, applications, data and user support functions within the organization.
• Build the systems, processes, and team required to support rapid growth and international expansion. Proactively identify and pursue opportunities to optimize new technologies to achieve key business objectives.
• Ensures staff, policies, processes, practices and technologies proactively protect, shield and defend the enterprise from cyber threats and prevent the occurrence and recurrence of cybersecurity incidents commensurate with Company’s risk tolerance.
• Develop procedures for control of all business systems, and provide systems and data backup, recovery and risk management support.
• Ensure appropriate governance and strategic oversight is in place to support the delivery of IT services and projects.
• Oversee the technical infrastructure (networks and computer systems) in the organization to ensure optimal performance
• Direct and organize IT-related projects Demonstrate accuracy and thoroughness; Look for ways to improve and promote quality; Apply feedback to improve performance; Monitor own work to ensure quality.
 
Leadership
• Act as a trusted advisor to the business in guiding the evaluation of new technologies and participate in the continuous improvement of applications and systems to drive innovation and support business goals leading transformation efforts and implementing business change.
• Build a world class IT department to support rapid growth, international expansion and inorganic growth strategy.
• Cross-functional and inter-disciplined leadership in a distributed and global team environment.
• Maintains a strong knowledge of business operations and applications to ensure meeting needs of organizational strategic goals through systems delivery.
• Consistently ensure that business is conducted with integrity at all times and that behavior aligns with iCIMS policies, procedures and core competencies.
 
Fiscal Discipline
• Consolidate all IT budgets across the company under IT and drive rationalization and reduced spend
• Direct the development and administration of Information Technology capital and expense budgets and maintain control procedures necessary to ensure compliance.
• Analyze the costs, value and risks of information technology to advise management and suggest actions
• Approve purchases of technological equipment and software and establish partnerships with IT providers
Qualifications:
 
• Minimum five (5) years of experience in executive IT leadership roles with prior success as a CIO driving business strategy in a global environment.
• Prior experience implementing, integrating and managing enterprise software systems required (NetSuite, company-redacted, Adaptive)
• Prior experience working in a private equity-backed company highly preferred.
• Prior experience working in a software as a service business highly preferred.
• Extensive knowledge of the IT field, making key decisions related to how organizations use and improve their IT resources to support business activities
• Strong strategic planning skills and the ability to enact those plans
• Strong executive presence along with global experience
• Track record building, leading and mentoring high-performing globally distributed IS/IT teams
• Significant experience working and leading cross-functionally in global fast-paced, high growth organizations
• Previous experience developing and executing on Master Data Strategy at the Enterprise Level is required
• An action-oriented leader who gets things done
• Outstanding written and verbal communication skills; proven ability to communicate effectively at C-level and to the Board of Directors
• Superior analytical and problem-solving capabilities
• Experienced with cybersecurity and IT system risk mitigation.
• Attention to detail, clear understanding of performance metrics, financial measurements and how to impact overall cost controls.
• Ability to adapt to rapidly changing situations and priorities, adjusting to new situations and demands.
• Excellent vendor management, influencing and negotiating skills.
• Leadership skills exhibiting the highest professional ethics and integrity.
• Has a contagious and positive work ethic, inspires others, and models iCIMS core competency behaviors
• Passion for inclusion and diversity
• Travel approximately 20%
 
Education/Certifications/Licenses Required
• BS in Computer Science or Business Administration or requisite experience.
• Masters’ degree in Information Systems or MBA strongly desired.

The Enterprise IT Chief Technology Officer and Director, EIT Technology Office, will be responsible for managing the Enterprise technology strategy and implementing a transformational DevOps Software Factory. The selected candidate will provide technical direction across the Enterprise IT business and operate as a highly collaborative, partnering organization, and leveraging subject matter experts from various functions across the business. The candidate will incorporate engagements, IT research, and Software Factory solutions to deliver innovative technical capabilities aligned to drive business value.

Key Responsibilities
Define and execute the Enterprise IT Cloud Strategy including hybrid, multi-cloud, and international capabilities.
Manage and lead all aspects of the development and delivery of DevSecOps Software Factory solutions into the business.
Define key technologies aligned to business area and program strategic value.
Cultivate relationships and partnerships with key DoD customers to collaborate on DevSecOps and Software Factory initiatives.
Integrate investments in emerging technology solutions with new service offerings.
Build and maintain staffing of a high-performing virtual team from multiple locations.
Develop and manage implementation of budget, schedule, and technical baseline.
Work to guarantee the reduction or removal of bottlenecks and inefficiencies while driving iteration towards a Minimum Viable Product (MVP) methodology.
Accountable for the creation and maintenance of DevOps pipelines and toolchains.
Foster a vibrant, highly effective culture that values trust, transparency, collaboration, velocity, continuous improvement, fail-fast experimentation, and dedication to quality.
Champion the cultural shift towards a lean/agile mindset, focused on a continuous flow of value creation and delivery.
Partner with the Chief Architect on the Enterprise IT Architecture Governance processes and practices to expand domain expertise.
Enable technology transformation that defines, designs, and develops new capabilities focused on delivering real business value to LM Programs.
Foster a strategic partnership with LM Ventures, CTO organization, and technical representative to the CIO for all matters.
 Toyota Financial Services Enterprise Platform Business Enablement Department is looking for a passionate and highly-motivated Business Information Officer of Corporate Systems.
 
Reporting to the Chief Information Officer the person in this role must be:
A team-oriented senior business technology ‘digital’ professional with maturity, intellect, integrity, political savvy, energy, and enthusiasm. Possesses a strong customer-focused orientation and can relate well to the needs of both internal and external users. Acts as a co-owner of business domain and strategic partner with various functions across the enterprise.
A Technology Platforms and Business Solution Architect and Builder, thinks entrepreneurially, designs with technical depth and operates like a business owner of 50+, 100+, 200+ people sized software product, platform and services company with strong financial discipline and keenness of an investor.
A leader who can impact both technology and business decisions. Can effectively articulate and communicate business alternatives to a variety of audiences across all levels of business and senior leadership with varying levels of knowledge about the technology underlying the choices.
Hands-on, into the details, dynamic leader whose track record buys immediate credibility across a multiple functional team of the enterprise. This person must be a confident communicator, able to influence and build meaningful relationships inside/outside of her/his department and with all levels of the enterprise.


Enterprise Business Enablement BIO
Has SPAN of Control of 5-7, Layers around 2-3, Staff Size is 250+ (Internal + external).
Is a peer to other BIOs, CISO (Chief Information Security Officer), Enterprise Architect, Enterprise Technology Operations and Automation, Enterprise Platform Enablement (Data and API), Head of Digital Academy and Talent, Office of CIO.
First Command is seeking an experienced technology leader to head our enterprise architecture practices. The Enterprise Architect (EA) is central to our client experience transformation and our ability to modernize and scale quickly. The EA will define and execute strategies that enable our future growth and innovation. Working with leadership, you will develop strategies, goals and leapfrogging opportunities and decompose those aspirations into foundational platforms, architectures and capabilities. You will bring external perspectives to drive innovative ideas and emerging technologies into First Command. You will contribute significantly to new capability development and our continuous organizational transformation.
 
The Enterprise Architect will develop, build and lead a team of architects who will support and execute the vision and strategy you articulate. You have experience inspiring and maximizing other’s efforts and leverage your own technical expertise to inform and guide others. You are a seeker of knowledge with an excellent grasp of the latest technology trends. You love to learn and are able to apply your learning in a pragmatic way while teaching and coaching others. A talent magnet, that attracts, develops and retains exceptional people for the First Command mission.
 
You pride yourself on your ability to clearly articulate the business value derived from technical ideas and strategies to varying levels of stakeholders, effectively bridging the gap between underlying technologies and the value they drive for our clients.
 
What will you be doing?
Work with Executives, Directors, Managers, and Individual contributors and the technology teams in order to formulate, refine and implement architectural strategies
Decompose identified strategies into enabling technical capabilities and architectural innovations
Lead your team to create alignment with stakeholders (functional and technical) on the architectural landscape; across international boundaries and here at home
Define and execute initiatives to pilot and scale supporting technologies and architectures, as well as the ownership and processes required to drive successful adoption and use
Advise business stakeholders on near-, mid- and long-term capabilities to inform future product and system innovation, strategy and design
Oversee the overall goals and vision for the architecture. This will include defining the roles, responsibilities, models, and quality attributes of our product line and platform architectures
Identify opportunities for incremental and transformative improvements to engineering productivity in support of a Lean-Agile environment
Create and evangelize the technical architectural vision and technical guidelines through Architecture Team leadership, creating forums and vehicles for teams to share information (design sprints, hackathons, collaborative whiteboard sessions, etc)
Attend meetups and conferences to network with other technical thought leaders and bring new concepts and best practices to First Command
Encourage and inspire other team members to achieve higher levels of technical capabilities through well thought-out designs and sharing from conferences, learning, training, and meet-ups
Has an engaging and collaborative leadership style
Champion an innovative and responsible culture that balances speed, flexibility and responsiveness with security, resiliency and sustainability
Mentor, encourage and coach citizen developers

Supervisory Responsibility
Supervises employees in area of responsibility and ensures delivery aligns with technical strategy
Monitors and measures success of the organization by utilizing an agreed upon set of metrics
Responsible for standard HR activities to include approving PTO, training requests, goal setting, and all aspects of performance management

What skills/qualifications do you need?
 
Education
Master’s degree in Computer Science or equivalent work-related experience

Work Experience
Direct, hands-on experience establishing enterprise architecture elements including reference architectures, EA and IT frameworks, roadmaps and design patterns (Zachmann, TOGAF, COBIT)
Excellent grasp of common architectural patterns (n-tier, event driven, microkernel, microservices, space based, etc.)
Current working knowledge of industry best practices for architectural governance of cloud, Agile/SAFe and DevSecOps
Broad and deep expertise in multiple technology domains: cloud, virtualization, data center migration (Azure & AWS), digital, cybersecurity, enterprise data management, including experience integrating multiple large-scale technical domains
Working knowledge of key financial sector and consumer regulations (SOX, GLBA, GDPR, CCPA, etc.)
History of delivering innovative solutions at scale with quality
Demonstrable experience in leading significant technical transformations
Exceptional people leadership skills and ability to create an outcome-based culture rooted in service to others while having fun
Technical thought leader and strong networker, experienced in developing white papers, conference presentations and panels, hackathons, leading meet-ups and participating in local and national networking groups
Experience with platform creation enabled through well-defined APIs

Certifications
Architecture, Azure and SAFe certifications where applicable

Knowledge, Skills And Abilities
Superior analytical, risk assessment and negotiation skills
Ability to understand the impact of change from the customer’s perspective
Proficient at interacting across all levels (i.e. executive, departmental, and field)
Excellent written and oral communication skills including explaining complex technical concepts to all parties
Excellent interpersonal, critical thinking and problem-solving skills
Job Summary
 
Overview of Job / Management and Reporting Structure
 
The VP, Enterprise Tools, DevOps, and Agile will set a technology strategy that aligns with our maturing environment. Delivers solutions and tools to enable automation of test and builds across on-prem and cloud offerings. Define and deliver our future technology architecture including critical new technology capabilities. Provides enterprise capability tools and automation tools to drive our business. Working closely with the business, applications, security and infrastructure teams, analyze business and technical problems and develop the appropriate framework to deliver business solutions that will meet Fannie Mae’s current and future business objectives. Create, champion and implement the architecture vision and strategy, associated standards, processes, and procedures to be used across the enterprise including the development and acquisition of new technological innovations, solutions and tools to improve internal operations and customer experience. The VP will report directly to the SVP & Chief Architect.
 
Key Job Functions & Duties
Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet strategic objectives
Identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Develop a team that supports the enterprise’s evolving cloud infrastructure and provide guidance on Site Reliability Engineering teams
Effectively adopt and utilize technologies to achieve best practices for Continuous Integration and Continuous Development
Continue to evolve deployment automation to enable increase deployment frequency and reduce deployment time
Develops road map for evolution of the application portfolio from current to future state
Facilitate evaluation and selection of software product standards, as well as the design of standard software configurations


Qualifications
Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent in a related field is required. Advanced degree is a plus.
10 or more years of related experience with 5 years or more in a leadership position
Hands on experience in DevOps, with proven track record of leading a team to transform the efforts of an engineering organization
Experience in an agile environment, and running agile through a modern platform
Demonstrated ability of successfully leading complex development operations for enterprise software
Passion and experience staying at the forefront of technology and the latest effective tools and advancements
Creative and strategic thinking to develop innovative solutions to problems
Ability to interact effectively with product and development teams at all levels
Ability to self-manage projects and experience coaching and mentoring others
Ability to adjust priorities quickly as circumstances dictate
Demonstrated leadership and project management skills
Building strong customer relationships and delivering customer-centric solutions.
Making good and timely decisions that keep the organization moving forward.
Creating new and better ways for the organization to be successful.
Seeing ahead to future possibilities and translating them into breakthrough strategies.
Building partnerships and working collaboratively with others to meet shared objectives.
Building strong-identity teams that apply their diverse skills and perspectives to achieve common goals.
Developing and delivering multi-mode communications that convey a clear understanding of the unique needs of different audiences.
Painting a compelling picture of the vision and strategy that motivates others to action.
Holding self and others accountable to meet commitments.
Knowing the most effective and efficient process to get things done with a focus on continuous improvement.


Competencies
Customer focus: Building strong customer relationships and delivering customer-centric solutions
Decision Quality: Making good and timely decisions that keep the organization moving forward
Cultivates Innovation: Creating new and better ways for the organization to be successful
Strategic mindset: Seeing ahead to future possibilities and translating them into breakthrough strategies
Collaborates: Building partnerships and working collaboratively with others to meet shared objectives
Builds effective teams: Building strong-identity teams that apply their diverse skills and perspectives to achieve common goals
Communicates effectively: Developing and delivering multi-mode communications that convey a clear understanding of the unique needs of different audiences
Drives engagement: Creating a climate where people are motivated to do their best to help the organization achieve its objective
Drives vision and purpose: Painting a compelling picture of the vision and strategy that motivates others to action
Ensures accountability: Holding self and others accountable to meet commitment
Drives results: Consistently achieving results, even under tough circumstances
Position Summary
 
The SVP of Infrastructure and Operations is responsible for the management and operation of the company's IT Infrastructure, Cloud and Support Services. The SVP position plays a key strategic role in managing the people, budget, company-wide IT assets and resources required to maintain, support, and upgrade to cloud and “as a service” solutions that will support the company's requirements. The SVP will focus on continued simplification of the environment through use of cloud based solutions with emphasis on improving quality of service and cost effectiveness across multiple business units. The ability to communicate issues, risks and challenges to Executive management and garner the buy-in and support that will enable technology to provide the highest level of service while maximizing the value and constantly looks into advancing infrastructure and future-proof technology.
 
The incumbent provides vision, strategy and strong leadership to ensure the evolution of our technology infrastructure aligns with current and long term Technology and business goals.
 
Responsibilities
 
 
Sets the vision, strategy and leadership for the IT infrastructure organization
Ensure a stable and reliable IT environment via sound management, measurement of performance
Ensures the Infrastructure Technology and Engineering team’s strategy enables successful execution of operations and service delivery, infrastructure software and platform engineering, infrastructure service management and automation, network engineering
Capable of significantly contributing expertise regarding complex problem resolution, solution design(s) and troubleshooting in the areas of Network and Server Infrastructure, Database and File systems, Customer Support and Data Center and Cloud/SaaS Management
Manages strategic relationships with all IT teams to ensure the delivery of services meets or exceeds the client’s expectations
Ensures the Service Management team’s strategy enables tools/automation development and deployment, service integration, IT Service management processes development and execution, and performance automation and operational analytics
Ensures the Workplace and End User Computing team enables execution of workplace engineering, service transition and delivery, and a positive end user experience for employees
Oversees a standard set of service delivery tools and processes that will provide the right level of governance for all IT teams, and that will result in client satisfaction
Accountable for ensuring that infrastructure meets the demands of the business, orchestrating delivery across a number of Service Providers
Oversees the service provider(s) performance of the services agreed to by the master services agreement for consistency, with both the spirit and the letter of the agreement
Oversees and monitors escalated service provider issues, change management processes, and escalation procedures
Accountable for ensuring that early warning is provided to the appropriate leaders across the IT team regarding degraded or missed service levels
Ensures timely resolution of escalated service delivery problems and minimizes the impact of any client service delivery issues
Strong appreciation with demonstrated leadership regarding IT controls including continuous assessment of security posture aligned with information security policies and ongoing improvements Identification/Prioritization/Remediation
Experience managing Data Centers and Cloud/SaaS Partners where standardization of hardware/software solutions and cost containment is key
Build & retain a high performance team. Strong ability to identify and develop talent
Responsible for ensuring operational compliance and continuous improvement on controls utilizing best practices (COBIT, ITIL)
Establish and monitor Change Management process regarding IT’s Disaster Recovery plans, as it relates to business applications, infrastructure recovery and Data Center management.
Effectively allocate and lead IT resources across numerous activities often with competing priorities
Manage Infrastructure Capital and Expense budgets
Ability to work in a rapidly changing, high growth environment
Demonstrated experience in managing technical vendors and service providers with emphasis on contract negotiations, vendor performance, and relationship management


Leadership Competencies
Leading Through Vision and Values - Keeps the organization's vision and values at the forefront of employee decision making and action
Exercise excellent judgment when deciding what is a strategic issue that needs greater insight and reflection as opposed to those that are operational in nature
Strong written and verbal communication skills and ability to communicate complex technical issues in simple terms. Conveys information and ideas to others in a convincing and engaging manner.
Proven experience managing a wide range of simultaneous IT initiatives
Managing Change - Initiates and/or manages the change process and energizes it on an ongoing basis, taking steps to remove barriers or accelerate its pace; serves as role model for how to handle change by maintaining composure and performance level under pressure or when experiencing challenges.
Problem Solving and Decision Making - Identifies and understands issues, problems, and opportunities; obtains and compares information from different sources to draw conclusions, develops and evaluates alternatives and solutions, solves problems, and chooses a course of action.
Professional Demeanor - Exhibits behavioral styles that convey confidence and command respect from others; makes a good first impression and represents the company in alignment with its values.
Strategy Development - Develops business plans by exploring and systematically evaluating opportunities with the greatest potential for producing positive results; ensures successful preparation and execution of business plans through effective planning, organizing, and on-going evaluation processes.
Able to operate at a high level and think strategically at times and then at other times be able to dig into the details and be very tactical and focused


Requirements
 
 
Fifteen (15+) years of infrastructure leadership experience with a minimum of five (5) years at a VP level
Five years recent experience in current and emerging Information Technology Service Management (ITSM) frameworks for computing environments which are required to deliver an IT system or software application in a managed services environment
Direct management of complex budgets with direct and indirect costs
Direct management of cross-functional, sourced, or matrixed teams.
Proven knowledge of ITIL Framework
Understanding of the quality assurance, risk management, and security considerations and their impact on overall technology environment
Experience in networking, hardware, operating systems, cloud, and enabling technologies such as middleware and databases
Bachelors Degree in Computer Science or related field


Preferred
Demonstrated success leading large-scale initiatives/transformations
Proven executive experience in strategic planning and budgeting within one or more business groups with a Dev Ops and IT Service Management focus
Experience with and knowledge of IT outsourcing activities in a managed services environment
Strong understanding of SDLC & Agile/Devops
Strong process management, negotiating, influencing and problem resolution skills
Proven ability to effectively prioritize and execute tasks in a high-pressure environment
Experience in business systems and process planning
Knowledge of financial services or consumer lending
Demonstrated ability to assess customer/client needs, creatively approach solutions, decide and influence appropriate courses of action
Graduate/post graduate degree in computer science, electrical or related degrees


 Global BPO firm is looking for a CDO to partner with the CIO on all BI/AI inititatives
 
Lead the digitalization of the entire global platform
 
4 direct reports
 
BI, AI and data science oversight.   
 
predicitive analysis leadership is a must
 
Have strong technical skills so you can tranni and develop others 
 
Develop cloud based architecture 
 
Leadership and ability to work with other fortune 1,000 customers daily
 
Pythin, R, agile scrum, DevOps and more 
 
SSRS, Tableau, Power BI
 
$215 base salary
 
30% bonus and much more
 
Please email, call or text me your resume and a good number to chat
 
Confidential retained search
The SVP Technology Applications will report directly to the CIO and will run Fay’s applications organization, assuming responsibility for six (6) teams that provide design, build and run support for Servicing Technology, Originations Technology, company-redacted, Custom Apps, Third Party Apps and Web Support including solution and architecture.
 
What you will do for Fay:
 
You will be responsible for Fay’s digital transformation strategy, implementation and execution
Oversee delivery projects to ensure architectural compliance and success
Champion and promote service improvements on an ongoing basis to continually improve quality and customer satisfaction
Facilitate a collaborative approach to problem solving and make well-reasoned decisions
Champion the company’s project and development methodologies and act as a guide and reference for other staff members
Ensure alignment of solutions and services to Fay’s Risk Framework and business needs
Ensure standards are maintained, balancing consistency with flexibility to support business needs
Establish quality standards, checkpoints, and communications processes to ensure project quality
Provide guidance for optimization of IT and business policies / procedures / processes
Support a strong business partnership focus throughout the company
You will build and lead the Applications team and provide supervision to employees and manage individual/team performance and development
Identify, select and manage vendors to ensure that service delivery and support meet performance and business objectives.
Continuously evaluate and assess current and future needs of the organization and make recommendations and business case requests to substantiate changes.
Assist with the development of staff, through coaching and training, to accomplish organizational, team and service goals
 
What you will bring to Fay:
 
Experience overseeing both the technical and managerial aspects of an enterprise applications team
Track record of delivery of digital transformation to an organization
Experience working closely with IT leadership, vendors, consultants, and internal resources, ensuring timely and orderly completion of tasks and activities, and the quality of deliverables
Ability to demonstrate working experience and knowledge with Application solutioning, development and support
Demonstrated experience in current understanding of IT assessment best practices, management techniques and industry trends within Enterprise Applications and Digital Transformation responsibility areas
Ability to research, develop, and keep abreast of tools, techniques, and process improvements
Minimum 3 years’ experience in mortgage servicing required.
Minimum 15 years’ experience in Information Technology (relevant experience with organizational digital transformation)
Excellent communications skills (verbal and written)
Excellent problem solving skills and troubleshooting skills with a strong attention to detail
Strong customer/client focus with ability to manage expectations appropriately and provide superior customer/client experience
Proficient use of Microsoft Excel, Access, Word, PowerPoint, Visio and SharePoint
ob Description
Overall accountability for driving efficiencies and effective customer and employee experience by creating a streamlined digital experience through innovation, technology, systems and processes that reinforce CenturyLink’s position as the trusted connection to the networked world
Identify, develop and drive creative and comprehensive strategies and tactics within the Field Business Operations organization to achieve organization and Company objectives
Ensure necessary measurements and analytics are in place to allow informed business decisions and to support performance management and SLA adherence at a department level
Carry out continuous improvement analysis of customer activity, team performance, and Company processes to identify and prioritize areas of opportunity, develop and quantify appropriate improvement plans, and lead the attainment of desired results
Develop collaborative relationships with key departments in the Company to align strategies and coordinate tactics requiring Field Business Operations involvement
Drive transformation initiatives that meet customer, system and cost optimization requirements in collaboration with stakeholder organizations outside of Field Business Operations, specifically Engineering, Marketing, IT and Product Management
Create and foster a high-quality work environment that helps attract, motivate and retain high quality team members
Achieve budget and business plan for department


Qualifications
12+ years related specialized experience with 5+ years of experience at the managerial level
Recognizable as a leader, possessing outstanding communication and interpersonal skills.
Ability to quickly establish credibility and rapport with a broad set of executives and constituencies.
Strong results orientation with demonstrated track record of success.
Strong interpersonal skills, presentation and negotiation skills and ability to work in fast-paced and independent environments.
Proven ability in building and sustaining high performing teams.
Experience in liaising with multiple operational contacts at executive and senior management levels.
High degree of adaptability.
Practical experience with Scaled Agile and Agile Methodologies
Demonstrated ability to guide others through the transition from a traditional delivery mindset to a Lean-Agile mindset
Analytical or process improvement experience, e.g. six-sigma, LEAN, or other statistical / process improvement areas


Executive, Data Strategy & Innovation
 
Reporting directly to the Chief Data Officer as a member of the Enterprise Data Group leadership team, this is an executive role that will lead the Data Innovation Strategy for the enterprise. This is the role for a candidate interested in driving new ideas for CoreLogic data and data visualization, for discovering industry partnership opportunities and for reimagining the future of data and technology in the real estate market.  The successful executive candidate will be a thought leader who has proven experience developing and bringing to market data innovations.  
 
Leadership
 
·         Envision the Future: Driving a Data Innovation business strategy that aligns with CoreLogic’s key initiatives.
·         Inspire & Energize: Build a high functioning team and peer leader relationships with a focus on innovating for the future and driving deliverables for innovations. Establish strong partnerships with key stakeholders, and evangelize the importance, value and opportunities for CoreLogic data.
·         Deliver Excellence: Drive high accountability and superior business results through the leadership team to establish and execute on a best in class Data Strategy.
 
Ownership for:
 
·         Evangelize Data Innovation with internal and external clients and stakeholders.
·         Drive external Business Development strategy.
·         Partner with internal technology and business leaders to identify, develop and execute new data opportunities.
·         Foster a culture that drives futuristic ideas, enrichment strategies and growth.
 
Additionally, the ideal candidate will:
 
·         Examine market trends to drive strategies for the organization to remain competitive.
·         Understand business strategy and objectives and translate them into data requirements.
·         Be an influencer for futuristic and disruptive thought patterns and technologies that can become breakthrough solutions.
·         Have experience in leading a data innovation or data technology function in the context of data as the product.
·         Recruit, develop and grow a strong talent pipeline of data management professionals.
 
Qualifications:
·         Bachelor degree in data, tech or business-related field.
·         10+ years of experience in a data or data technology field.
·         Strong executive presence, with excellent verbal and written communication skills.
·         Proven track record of leading teams and individuals.
·         Demonstrated ability to build effective relationships and influence and partner with internal and external stakeholders.
·         Successful experience in strategic business development.
Job Summary
 
The Head of Information Technology (CTO) is the most senior information technology executive at MoneyGram and is a key member of the leadership team. The CTO will drive overall technology strategy and implementing key programs that drive profitable growth and a competitive advantage. The incumbent will be a proven dynamic leader who will lead the continuing evolution of a best-in-class global, enterprise wide information technology program that operates as an enabler to the business. The CTO is expected to work closely with key stakeholders to drive priorities, communicate progress and establish a proactive approach to business challenges.
 
Primary Responsibilities
Develops and executes the technology strategy which is aligned with key business partners and internal/external stakeholders.
Defines critical objectives and is crisp with prioritizing investments and time to maximize return.
Drives an important cultural evolution within the IT organization to stress the importance of return on investment, accountability and optimal operational efficiencies.
Facilitate transformational change, fostering and promoting a faster moving, more creative and agile environment to keep pace with the industry, competition and external environment.
Builds excitement around the IT brand and transformation (inside and outside of the organization) to attract and retain talent and enable change.
Promotes productive and positive change to address business challenges.
Oversees an effective IT organizational structure and evaluates current practices to ensure the highest and best use of systems.
Evolves the existing structure to incorporate new governance models and processes to maximize technology investments. This will include the development of a robust, structured PMO.
Enables innovation and technology trends to create business value by tracking a broad range of emerging technologies to focus on customer needs.
Leverages demonstrable leadership qualities to inspire and challenge a large team of technology executives.
Appreciates the inherent challenges associated with leading transformational change across the organization coupled with a rapidly evolving industry.
Promotes and oversee strategic relationships between internal IT resources and external parties, including vendors and partners.
Presents the external face of MoneyGram’s technologies to its partners and consumers.
Develops, implements and executes business plans in a positive manner with passion, teamwork and effective communication.
Coordinates enterprise standards, technology architecture and IT governance processes in accordance with strategic planning efforts and regulatory requirements.
Performs other duties as assigned.


Education
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, business administration, or a related field is required.
Masters’ Degree is preferred.


Experience
15+ years of increasingly responsible experience in the field of systems programming, software development and/or technical project management.
15+ years in and Information Technology leadership roles.
7+ years’ experience managing several systems development teams simultaneously.
7+ years project management experience following a structured development methodology.


Essential Skills
Broad technology experience and leadership from the direct or related industries with a reputation of effective transformation, vision and execution.
Breadth of technology acumen to lead the function across an enterprise to include experience and knowledge in leading application development, infrastructure and emerging technologies to support a customer oriented business model.
Experience in strategic planning and execution and considerable knowledge of business theory, business processes, management, budgeting, and business office operations.
Substantial exposure to data processing, analytics, hardware platforms, enterprise software applications, application integration, and outsourced systems including but not limited to mainframe operating systems.
Excellent understanding of project management details, with a successful project management background.
Experience with implementation of information technology integrations in a larger organization.
 What You’ll Do
Oversee our national resourcing function, defining processes and assisting our business leaders in delivering with a combination of market teams and national centers of excellence;
Oversee systems and tools (company-redacted, Mavenlink, Jira, and others) to support our main business workflows for marketing, selling, and delivery;
Manage and develop our offshore capabilities, ensuring full integration into the broader delivery organization;
Collaborate with finance and employee experience on efficient processes for onboarding employees;
Elevate a service oriented PMO to execute internal projects with a high degree of integrity and efficiency;
Continuously improve standards for the client facing PMO that can be used across the business;
Accelerate the integration of acquired businesses by educating and onboarding them into our systems and processes;
Establish standards for reporting and analytics that provide operational insights on client and employee performance;
Establish documentation, playbooks, and training materials that memorialize our standard ops and procedures;
Partner closely with the finance, employee experience, M&A, and client services leadership to actively solve for ad hoc operational needs.

Who You Are
You are experienced at developing and implementing delivery and operational processes in an agency setting or consultancy;
10+ years in a Project/Program Management and/or Operations capacity in a consulting or agency setting;
Experience representing delivery and operations in "live" situations such as pitches;
Experience with M&A, ideally having been part of an acquired company and/or being part of the company acquiring other companies;
Deep understanding of the digital project lifecycle and the role of the various team members;
Background handling both domestic and offshore external staffing partners;
Experience in financial analysis and financial modeling;
Ability to see and communicate the big picture across multiple projects;
Can take complex issues and present them in a simple and easy to follow manner;
Gifted at steering teams towards decisions and results;
Effective relationship management and influencing skills;
Strong organizational and planning skills;
Service oriented attitude (flexible, personable, empathic);
Bachelor’s degree required, MBA Preferred;
Able to travel extensively as required.

Who We Are
 
We are a leading independent customer experience agency in North America that was born in California, at the intersection of business, design, and technology. Our purpose is to bring moments of Truth & Beauty into people’s lives by creating customer experiences that are good for people and good for business. We drive growth and loyalty through a relentless focus of placing our client’s customers at the center of their business. Led by the experts in strategy, marketing, data, design, and technology, we work in blended teams, solving client problems and delivering results at market speed. These teams help Fortune 500 companies like Comcast, Oracle, Twitter, U.S. Bank, company-redacted, Sephora, UnitedHealthcare, and TD Ameritrade Institutional invent, transform, and perform to deliver new brand and business value.
 
 
Are you the kind of person that is motivated by the challenge of a dynamic, changing market? Can you utilize and exploit progressive systems and processes to satisfy urgent business needs? Are you a good partner with your teammates; driven to execute team and individual commitments that align with business vision? Does the idea of a high visibility and high impact role in a medium sized, growing company excite you? Are you interested in being part of a team that strives to achieve high business impact, execution excellence and has a lot of fun while we are doing it? Are you ready? We are! Join us in our journey towards liberating today’s fragmented healthcare systems to Connect Care Everywhere.
 
company-redacted is looking for a Vice President, IT DevOps and QA positionwho is a passionate power contributor that will provide effective collaboration, facilitation, leadership, and coaching skills supporting the quality development and release of our applications. This person will have a Manager, DevOps and Manager QA as direct reports and be responsible for their development and evaluations. The direct reports will have teams of 8-9 employees each focused on creating a DevOps and QA center of excellence in Dallas, Texas including a few remote employees. The position will be responsible for strategic and tactical capabilities enforcing the rules of SDLC best practices, removing impediments from their teams while promoting self-management and constantly improving our standards of work.
 
THIS JOB MIGHT BE FOR YOU, IF…
 
You, as the VP IT DevOps and Quality Assurance, have deep knowledge and expertise in both agile and traditional SDLC processes and best practices and the judgement and practical experience to lead high-performing infrastructure and executing DevOps and QA roadmaps while collaborating with software developers and engineering teams.
 
You are familiar with creating and managing IT budgets, creating and staffing complex projects and tracking progress to goals, ensuring process discipline, gathering and interpreting key performance indicators to optimize execution and inform tactical and strategic decision making.
 
 
Reports to: CIO
Location(s): Dallas, TX
 
YOU’RE GOOD AT:
 
Leading and execution of plans.
Reporting to top management.
Executive strategic roadmaps for DevOps and QA.
Getting results through collaboration with other IT, engineering and architecture, client success and product management teams.
Implementing best practice SDLC practices matched to the needs of different initiatives
Providing process discipline and coaching on process, practices deliverables formats and best practices
Manage performance to major job objectives and overall job description including behavioral norms for process participants, including dotted line Agile team members
Creating and presenting program and project budgets and plans.
Finding and implementing ways to improve cost-efficiency.
Communicate with other managers, developers, product managers and technical support specialists on product or personnel issues
Participate proactively in developing and maintaining team standards, tools, and best practices
Assist team leads with making appropriate commitments through work selection and task definition
Organize and facilitate estimation, business requirements review and planning update meetings
Track and communicate project/release progress
Facilitate discussion and conflict resolution
Administrative management duties including vacation schedules, sick time, weekly time logging, and other corporate compliance standards
Serve as liaison between technical and non-technical departments
Hiring and exiting staff as required.
 
YOU HAVE:
 
10+ years of experience in management and leadership of direct or virtual teams.
Bachelor’s degree in engineering or business administration (Master's a plus).
In-depth knowledge of data-centric business applications
In-depth knowledge of DevOps and QA technologies and disciplines including automation of manual testing procedures.
Experience with GitLab, SauceLabs and Selenium technologies or equivalent required.
Experience with Shift left QA methods and scrum teams required.
Healthcare IT experience is a strongly preferred
Intimately familiar project management skills
Thorough understanding of the software development lifecycle
Agile or Scaled Agile coaching experience a strong plus
Ability to understand technical issues at a high level
Must have exceptional communication, organization, and time management skills
Must be collaborative in driving decisions
Must be “self-motivated” and capable of managing multiple priorities and tasks
Must be a “team-player” with the ability to work within collaborative environments
Excellent interpersonal skills, ability to work with diverse personality types
Ability to coach the team to reach their highest potential
Passion to proactively seek ways to improve processes
Self-confidence to be assertive when taking a position and can constructively resolve issues
Creative, resourceful and innovative at tackling complex challenges (in a timely matter)
Self-taught and self-teaching, with a demonstrated aptitude for acquiring knowledge and technical skills
Organized and selVice President, Site Reliability Engineering
DigitalOptometrics | Lake Success, NY
    
Posted Date
2/27/2020
Description
The Vice President, Site Reliability Engineering is responsible for the reliability and stability of DigitalOptometrics’ offerings. This newly created role will own the SaaS reliability vision for the company, driving continuous improvement through a combination of development and operations initiatives as well as process excellence. The position has full solid-line responsibility for operations of SaaS offerings including the deployment, management, monitoring, reporting, troubleshooting, and repair of production systems. The position also has solid-line responsibility for cloud engineering developers as well as dotted-line influence over software engineers in the product development groups. This position also works closely with other functional teams such as product management and customer success to ensure that DigitalOptometrics SaaS offerings meet or exceed business objectives and demands of ever-rising customer expectations. Responsibilities include establishing and maintaining a rigorous process of continuous improvement, devising solution plans that cross functional areas, meeting SLA requirements, enabling the company to adopt a more aggressive SLA, managing personnel, and improving processes rigor. This position manages a professional, highly skilled staff.
 
Responsibilities:
 
Drives strategic goals of growth and profitability of our SaaS business via owning, implementing, and safeguarding a state-of-the-art site reliability vision.
Partners with Product Management and Engineering leaders to ensure that operational and reliability requirements are clearly articulated and integrated into the product roadmap.
Full responsibility for achieving DigitalOptometrics’ contractual SLA requirements.
Implements a world-class continuous improvement program that includes in-depth root-cause analysis, solution identification and implementation, and ongoing conformance to policy.
Responsible for risk assessment and management including proactively identifying, communicating, and mitigating risks associated with ongoing operations and planned releases.
Solid line responsibility for the SaaS Operations and Cloud Engineering functions which includes financial management responsibility covering financial planning, budget management and attainment of financial objectives. Identifies and assesses available options and understands costs, benefits, and risks associated with alternative approaches.
Responsible for process development and internal documentation for all SaaS applications. Analyzes current processes, documentation, tools, and methodologies and leads ongoing refinement to achieve continuous cycles of improvement. Prepares and presents proposals for SRE strategy and direction.
Plans and executes projects in support of the SRE objectives, and assures projects are delivered with high quality, on time, and within budget. Clearly defines scope, objectives and approach for each project. Develops a Master Project Plan encompassing all key initiatives, considering dependencies, resources, risk mitigation and business priorities. Delivers executive level presentations, communicating the master plan to senior management.
Helps define evolutionary and revolutionary changes to system architecture to improve system performance and scale.
Responsible for all components of the production data centers and public cloud regions including the management and operations of customer facing applications and websites.
Minimum Qualifications:
 
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field (Master’s Degree preferred)
Minimum of 10 years’ experience in senior management (director level or higher) of large-scale web application operations and administration in a 24/7/365 environment in a self-hosted or co-located data center
Critical Skills/Competencies:
 
Very strong leadership skills
In depth knowledge of technical components of SaaS operations, including servers, databases, operating systems, networks, data centers, monitoring tools, etc.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills, ability to communicate effectively with people in technical and non-technical roles
Strong conflict resolution competence
SaaS experience from a self-hosted or co-located data center is a must. Participation in a 24x7 on-call environment, requiring the knowledge of managing 24x7 environments
Microsoft Azure experience a must
Experience building and managing a mature Release Engineering function that supports highly automated continuous integration and deployment capabilities into both co-located data centers and Microsoft Azure using best of breed processes and tools
Proven success developing and communicating a business vision and strategic plans
Experience with and deep knowledge of SSAE16 SOC2 audits and compliance
Experience with the use and implementation of monitoring and management frameworks, specifically for cloud environments
Experience managing a team of Site Reliability Engineers
Experience leading development teams
Extensive experience developing and executing a structured change management processes for highly available environments
Industry knowledge and awareness of best practices, trends, and latest features of Internet, SaaS, and Cloud delivered applications
Strong commitment to customer service and satisfaction, and excellent customer facing presence
Experience with direct customer interaction
Strong follow-through, focused and detailed oriented
Must have strong project management knowledge and experience (PMP certification is a plus)
f-directing with the ability to identify priorities and mobilize projects in an orderly fashion to achieve desired results
Respectful, professional interpersonal working style
Approachable and willing to offer helpful solutions
The Wholesale Loan Technology – Software Engineering Director (Loan IQ Program Manager Business Investments – Structured Lending) is a senior position within the JPMorgan Chase Wholesale Loan Technology Core Loans leadership team. This individual will be responsible for optimizing current domain capabilities, developing the roadmap for the strategic evolution of the product & maximizing value for operations & market partners.
As a senior leader in Software Engineering, you will combine your years of proven expertise with a never-ending quest to create innovative technology through solid engineering practices. You’ll lead a highly inspired and inquisitive team of technologists who are already developing and deploying applications to the highest standards. With your deep knowledge of design, analytics, development, coding, testing and application programming, your team will raise their game even more, meeting your standards, as well as satisfying both business and functional requirements. Your passion and experience in one or more technology domains will help solve complex and mission critical problems, internally and externally.  As a constant learner and early adopter, you’re already embracing leading-edge technologies and methodologies; your example encourages others to follow suit. In addition to creating solutions with your in-house team, you’ll also work alongside our team of technologists from around the world who are just as dedicated as you are. We embrace a culture of experimentation and constantly strive for improvement and learning. You’ll work in a collaborative, trusting, thought-provoking environment—one that encourages diversity of thought and creative solutions that are in the best interests of our customers globally.  The candidate will be working within the Wholesale Loan Technology (WLT) at JPMorgan Chase as part of the Core Loans Structured Lending Technology team. They will be working on the Loan IQ program,  the firm’s Global Strategic structured loans platform.  This program consists of a series of critical projects focused on line of business initiatives, including mandatory and regulatory projects.  This role is specifically for a senior position on the management team to oversee one or more of these critical programs.  As a lead on the Core Loan Technology team, you will help provide quality technology solutions to address line of business needs.  This includes, but is not limited to:  Coordinate a large and complex program across multiple work streams potentially including:
Business Analysis
Interface Development & Integration of Loan IQ with other platforms, both internal and external to the firm
Data Warehousing and Reporting
New systems development
Manage multiple simultaneous work streams, each consisting of one or more Projects
Overseeing a significant team of 10-50+ (Employees and Consultants)
Hire Key team members, potentially in multiple locations including Jersey City, NJ;  New York, NY; Chicago, IL;  Plano, TX; Mumbai and Bangalore India
Act as a liaison between the Wholesale Loan Technology team and the many Technology, Operations, Business, and other partners in this space.
Develop an organizational model to supports the primary responsibilities of ongoing business demand, defect remediation and strategic business initiatives.
Determine the right allocation of roles & responsibilities, capacity requirements to implement and sustain the strategic program objectives.
The Wholesale Loan Technology Application Development Director will partner with the Lending Product Owners to focus on designing the release schedule, testing rigor, tools and protocol…while interacting with various lines of business and technology partners to ensure the process serves the best interest of the end-users, customers and market dependent parties. This includes evaluating and leveraging the latest technology available to address performance, automated testing capabilities, new functionality improvements for anticipated market adjustments and other factors impacting the viability of the ongoing program (replacing Libor in the short term).   Collaborate with Sr stakeholders to balance the pace & intrusiveness of change, mitigating the risks while being progressive in building capabilities that keep JPM in the forefront of its market offering.  Additionally, the product owner will lead their team in the implementation of a customer friendly, transparent and timely delivery model from intake through design process for day-to-day requests from end users. Building a toolkit to evaluate, estimate, prioritize and communicate the pipeline and cycle time to address or deliver the appropriate solutions for the operations & market partners in an agile fashion.	 The position requires a results-focused, visionary, influential and process-disciplined leader with strong technical & business acumen to deliver against an extensive current & future-state roadmap.  This person must have the ability to develop a multi- year plan to transform the core loans program to a world class operating platform, ensuring a healthy balance between the strategic long term and tactical quarterly objectives. 
This role requires a wide variety of strengths and capabilities, including:
 
 
 
10+ years strong background in Loans or related financial products
Demonstrated knowledge of the Loan product domain
Must have 5+years of Java experience
5+ years of Oracle/DB2 experience
5+ years’ experience designing and successfully leading large scale operational change
Computer Science / Engineering degree or equivalent experience
Mastery of application, data and infrastructure architecture disciplines
Command of architecture, design and business processes
Knowledge of industry wide technology trends and best practices
Demonstrated ability to communicate effectively to all levels of management including CTO, CIO and Line of business heads in  both written and oral / presentation communications skills
Keen understanding of financial control and budget management
Expertise in working in in large, collaborative teams to achieve organizational goals, and passionate about building an innovative culture
Proven ability to foster an environment of inclusion, with a focus on developing talent across the organization
Experienced in modern programming languages
Must have a strong Project Management background with proven organizational skills with focused detail, time management, planning skills and the ability to handle competing priorities
Preferred Qualifications
 
Familiarity with other Traditional Credit Products, including Letters of Credit
10+ years’ experience specifically with the Loan IQ product –  Front End (user interface) or back end (database), as well as integration capabilities via SDK and APIs
Familiarity with other loan processing systems such as ALS, ACBS and Strategy
 
 
 
 
 

Description

Digitization is an essential ingredient of company-redacted’s overall Integrated Growth strategy, fuels growth, margin improvement and asset efficiency. The vision is a Digital company-redacted which pervasively relies on data for insights and decision making, leveraging automation for efficiency, speed, precision, and designs, develops and delivers digital experiences with agility. Over the last 3 years much progress has been made in the areas such as consumer data platforms, cloud adoption, data and analytics with embedded machine learning and cybersecurity. While investment in those foundational platforms will continue, the priority is to activate digital solutions across the whole organization, especially in Global Business Units and Enterprise Markets where company-redacted’s customers and consumers are. The recently launched “Digital for Growth and Value” strategy has the primary objective to accelerate digital transformation at the front face of the Business thanks to agile solutions built on top of enterprise core platforms.

The Role

We are seeking a Senior IT leader to lead the enterprise architecture strategy for digital transformation, who will also lead the definition and implementation of a modern application integration platform. The role will report directly to the CIO and be a member of the company-redacted IT Leadership team. The incumbent will lead a global team of approximately 77 employees (17 directly reporting and 60 in dotted line), managing directly a budget of $10MM-$15MM.

The Main Responsibilities Of The Role Include

Delivery of enterprise architecture for digital transformation

Drive definition and adoption of architecture framework aligned with strategic objectives, including foundational elements such as data and analytics, application and data integration, application development. Be current with industry, technology and market trends and innovation, factoring those into the ongoing evolution and continuous improvement of the strategy. Translate the strategy into executable roadmaps comprehensive of system/technology, application, process and security/compliance dimensions.

Delivery of enterprise application integration layer

Define and implement a modern application integration layer which to enable processes to seamlessly flow across systems. The platform will expose key data and functions of enterprise platforms (e.g. through APIs and Microservices) to enable the agile implementation of digital solutions. Define a migration strategy for existing solutions. Define SLA and operational emodel, working with the IT service organization to ensure operational excellence.

Effective enterprise architecture governance

Establish an effective enterprise architecture governance process to enable agility and speed of delivery while ensuring adherence to architecture tenets, operational excellence and security standards. Clarify the boundaries between enterprise core platforms and Business Units/Markets solutions, and integration among them. Foster adoption by influencing stakeholders across the organization thanks to effective communication, networking and conflict management.

People leadership

Build, maintain, inspire and motivate a high-performance team of approximately 15 line reports with high engagement levels and strong architecture and technology skills, while functionally leading the broader community of practice of more than 60 architects across company-redacted. Coach ad develop direct reports, as well as mentoring junior staff members to build a strong and diverse pipeline of technical talents in the EA team.

Competencies

The main competencies of Vice President, Enterprise Architecture and Integration include:

Strategic Thinking and Visioning

Ability to see and communicate the big picture in an inspiring way, being forward looking and staying ahead of industry and technology trends. Ability to tie all Enterprise Architecture work to the strategies of the business/service lines they enable – platform, data, application, business process.

Creativity / Innovation

Generating new and innovative approaches to problems. Staying current with technology and innovation trends.

Persuasion

Ability to convince others to pursue a course of action. Ability to influence internal and external stakeholders.

Drive for Results

Motivated by success and passionate about working and achieving higher results. Persists to complete tasks / responsibilities, even in the face of difficulties, is optimistic and tenacious all through.

Qualifications


Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, or equivalent degree; Master’s Degree in computer science or related field a plus.
15+ years’ work experience in IT, including leading high-performance technical teams in large, global enterprises.
Proven and recent experience in leading complex IT initiatives including CI/CD and agile application development, cloud transformation, application integration. Strong exposure to, and working knowledge of, security and network design infrastructures.
Ability to translate business directions and strategies into technology architectures; strong process development and re-design skills.
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills with a strong affinity for collaboration.
Proven leadership capabilities, hiring and developing talent and driving high performance having led globally dispersed teams in recent past.
TOGAF, Zachman, or Agile certification a plus.
 

